<?xml version='1.0' encoding='UTF-8'?>
<DOC><DOCNO> FR881108-0022 </DOCNO><DOCID>fr.11-08-88.f2.A1021</DOCID><TEXT><FTAG tagnum="4701"/><ITAG tagnum="90"><T4>Federal Register</T4> / Vol. 53, No. 216 / Tuesday, November 8, 1988/ Rules and Regulations<ITAG tagnum="52">DEPARTMENT OF THE INTERIOR</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="18">Office of Surface Mining Reclamation and Enforcement</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">30 CFR Parts 701, 780, 784, 815, 816, and 817</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">Surface Coal Mining and Reclamation Operations; Permanent RegulatoryProgram; Reclamation and Operation Plan; Performance Standards; Roads</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>AGENCY: </T2>Office of Surface Mining Reclamation and Enforcement,Interior.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>ACTION: </T2>Final rule.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUMMARY: </T2>The Office of Surface Mining Reclamation and Enforcement(OSMRE) of the Department of the Interior (DOI) is amending its rules governingroads at surface and underground mining operations and coal explorationoperations. The provisions for roads are to replace rules that previouslywere suspended. These rules define a road, establish a road classificationsystem, and set forth performance standards that allow regulatory authoritiesto approve designs tailored to local needs. Also, revised information requirementsfor the reclamation and operations plan reflect changes in the performancestandards for roads.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>EFFECTIVE DATE: </T2>December 8, 1988.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>FOR FURTHER INFORMATION CONTACT:</T2>Robert Wiles, P.E., Office ofSurface Mining Reclamation and Enforcement, U.S. Department of the Interior,1951 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20240; Telephone (202) 343-1502.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="10"><T2>SUPPLEMENTARY INFORMATION: </T2><ITAG tagnum="26">I. Background </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">II. Discussion of Final Rule and Comments </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="26">III. Procedural Matters</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">I. Background </ITAG>Section 701(28)(B) of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act (theAct), 30 U.S.C. 1201 <T3>et seq., </T3>defines ``surface coal mining operations'' to includeroads constructed, improved or used for access to the mine site and forhaulage. The Act also establishes specific environmental protection performancestandards governing roads used for access into and across the mine siteduring surface coal mining and reclamation operations in section 515(b)(17) and (18). Section 515(b)(17) provides that all surface coal miningand reclamation operations shall ``insure that the construction, maintenance,and postmining conditions of access roads into and across the site of operationswill control or prevent erosion and siltation, pollution of water, damageto fish or wildlife or their habitat, or public or private property.''Section 515(b)(18) provides that all operations shall ``refrain from theconstruction of roads or other access ways up a stream bed or drainagechannel or in such proximity to such channel so as to seriously alter thenormal flow of water.'' Section 516(b)(10) of the Act imposes these samerequirements on roads associated with underground mines with such modificationsas are necessary to accommodate the distinct differences between surfaceand underground mining.The permanent regulatory program promulgated on March 13, 1979, containedexpansive and detailed provisions pertaining to road construction, maintenanceand postmining conditions. The rule at 30 CFR 701.5 defined roads for surfacemining operations and established a three-tiered road classification system(44 FR 15320, March 13, 1979). Specific provisions for each classificationwere established at 30 CFR 816.150-176 (44 FR 15416-15421). At the sametime, similar requirements for underground mines were established at 30CFR 817.150-817.176 (44 FR 15442-15447).The permanent program rules were challenged in a suit filed with the U.S.District Court for the District of Columbia. The court remanded the rulesfor further consideration because the Secretary had not given adequatenotice that he was considering a classification system, <T3>In Re: Permanent Surface Mining Regulation Litigation, </T3>No. 79-1144,slip op. at 32-36 (D.D.C. May 16, 1980). As a result of the court decision,OSMRE suspended its permanent program rules for roads (45 FR 51547, August4, 1980).New rules substantially different from the remanded and suspended 1979rules were proposed on January 4, 1982 (47 FR 56) and April 16, 1982 (47FR 16592) and were finalized in a rule published May 16, 1983 (48 FR 22110).The 1983 rules, although constituting an extensive expansion of the statutoryperformance standards, gave regulatory authorities greater flexibilityas to the details of road design than did the remanded and suspended 1979rules. Upon issuance, the 1983 rules were challenged in the U.S. DistrictCourt for the District of Columbia. In response to the challenge, the courtremanded andSection;816.150(a) <T3>(In Re: Permanent Surface Mining Regulation Litigation II, </T3>No.79-1144, slip op. at 24-28 (D.D.C. Oct. 1, 1984), hereafter <T3>Round andCx.21;II). </T3>The court held that OSMRE, in promulgating theclassification system in 30 CFR 816.150(a), violated the AdministrativeProcedure Act (APA), 5 U.S.C. 553, by again not providing adequate noticeand opportunity to comment (Slip op. at 28).Subsequently, in an amended order filed December 10, 1984, the court remandedall of the rules governing roads which were dependent upon the road classificationsystem. OSMRE then suspended those rules as well as the definition of <T3>road </T3>at andSection;701.5 (50 FR 7278, February 21, 1985). The definitionwas suspended to give OSMRE an opportunity to reconsider all the provisionsin the rules affecting the performance standards for roads.OSMRE proposed new road rules on November 3, 1987 (52 FR 42258) that werequite similar to the remanded and suspended 1983 rules. Public hearingswere scheduled for January 5, 1988, in Washington, DC; Denver, CO; andKnoxville, TN. Since no one requested to testify at these hearings, nonewere held. The comment period closed on January 12, 1988. OSMRE received152 individual comments from 23 sources: Ten industry associations, eightState regulatory authorities, two public interest groups, and three Federalagencies. OSMRE also received comments from the Environmental ProtectionAgency (EPA) after the comment period had closed.  The rules adopted today replace the rules suspended in 1985 (50 FR 7278,February 21, 1985). The minor changes from the proposed rule are identifiedin the following discussion of the final rule. OSMRE believes, based onanalysis of the issues involved, the legislative history of the Act, andthe administrative record of this rulemaking, including comments received,that this final rule is a reasonable interpretation and expansion of theprovisions of sections 515(b) (17) and (18) of the Act.  OSMRE has not identified any differences between roads for surface andunderground mines that would appear to necessitate different regulatoryprovisions under this rulemaking. Therefore, the final permitting ruleapplicable to roads for surface mining activities at 30 CFR 780.37 andthe final rule for underground mining activities at 30 CFR 784.24 are identical.Similarly, the final performance standards for surface mining activitiesat 30 CFR 816.150 and 816.151 are identical to the performance standardsfor underground mining activities at 30 CFR 817.150 and 817.151 respectively.The final permitting rule applicable to support facilities for surfacemining activities at 30 CFR 780.38 and the final rule applicable to suchfacilities for underground mining activities at andSection;784.30 are alsoidentical. The discussion of the revisions to 30 CFR 780.37, 780.38, 816.150,and 816.151 should be understood to apply also to the revisions to 30 CFR784.24, 784.30, 817.150, and 817.151, respectively.<ITAG tagnum="84">II. Discussion of Final Rule and Comments  </ITAG>This portion of the preamble consists of a description of the rules adopted,changes to the proposal, comments received, and OSMRE's response to comments.A. General Comments  In addition to receiving comments on specific provisions of the November3, 1987, proposed rules, OSMRE received several general comments. Two commentersrequested time extensions of 30 days to allow adequate time to evaluatethe proposed regulations. OSMRE did not accede to the time extension requests;however, OSMRE did give full consideration to all comments received onthe proposed rule regardless of whether the comments were timely or late.The proposed rule allowed seventy days for the submission of written comments.OSMRE believes that this amount of time strikes a balance between the needsof reviewers and the agency's responsibility to implement the Act expeditiouslythrough regulations.  One commenter stated that the proposed regulations do not provide consistentguidance to regulatory authorities, or establish minimum national standardsfor construction, maintenance, or reclamation of roads. The commenter suggestedthat the proposed regulations be withdrawn, and noted that OSMRE has amandatory obligation to include standards in the regulations, and thatfailure to provide these standards is a violation of the Act. The commenterstated that Congress enacted sections 515(b) (10), (17), and (18) withthe intent to set ``appropriate limits'' for road construction, manintenance,and reclamation. The commenter also stated that the 1979 regulations implementedthis congressional intent to provide minimum standards, but that adequatespecific requirements no longer exist in the proposed regulations. Thecommenter argued further that, under these regulations. Federal and Stateagencies, particularly States whose regulations can be ``no more stringentthan'' the Federal program will be unable to set meaningful standards.The commenter also suggested that the proposed regulations be withdrawnpending the outcome of current litigation in the U.S. Court of Appealsfor the District of Columbia Circuit where the issue of requiring minimumnational standards was under consideration.OSMRE disagrees. Sections 515(b)(17) and (18) of the Act establish statutoryperformance standards for roads. In its January 29, 1988, opinion, theCourts of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit concurred with theSecretary of the Interior that the Act does not automatically and inevitablyrequire him to ``flesh out'' statutory performance standards except inlimited cases for which such a requirement is clearly established, suchas sections 515(b)(13), 516(b)(5) and 517(a) of the Act (<T3>NWF v. Hodel</T3>, 839 F.2nd 694, 734 (DC Cir., 1988), hereafter <T3>NWF v. Hodel</T3>). The court went on to say, ``The Secretary is toexercise his informed discretion in deciding what other statutory performancestandards bear elucidation or elaboration. In short, we read the Act ** * to afford the Secretary discretion, absent an express statutory instructionto regulate, to decide whether fleshing out is appropriate in light ofother concerns. Chief among these concerns is a need to accommodate widelyvarying local conditions that will not admit of a single nationwide rule.''(id. p. 735) Additional material in support of the legal sufficiency ofthe regulatory approach taken in these rules appears in the Secretary'sMarch 5, 1984 district court brief filed in <T3>Round II at p. 160-166.</T3>This discussion concerned the Secretary's elimination in 1983 of minimumnational environmental standards contained in the 1979 regulations involving:(1) The contemporaneous reclamation of mined lands, (2) the design of earth``terraces'' on restored land, and (3) the exemption from the ``approximateoriginal contour'' requirement of lands featuring unusually thick or thinoverburden. The court went on to say, ``Under [<T3>Motor Vehicle Mfrs. Ass'n v. State Farm Mut. Auto. Ins. Co.</T3>, 463U.S. 29, 43 (1983)] the agency must examine the relevant data and articulatea satisfactory explanation for the revised regulation if it is to gainjudicial approbation'' (id.). The Secretary, therefore, is required toarticulate a satisfactory explanation for the final rule and to discussthe specific comments received on the proposed rule. However, the Secretaryis not required to justify changes from either the 1979 rule or the 1983rule since both were invalidated upon appeal.OSMRE believes this rulemaking is consistent with the above decision ofthe Court of Appeals for the District of Columbia Circuit and that morespecific minimum national standards for construction, maintenance, or reclamationof roads are not necessary. The rules adopted today constitute a considerableexpansion and fleshing out of the statutory requirements of section 515(b)(17)and (18) of the Act. However, in accordance with section 101(f) of theAct, the rules take into account regional, physical, biological and climaticdiversity among the States by providing State regulatory authorities withthe flexibility to incorporate regional and local considerations into theirprograms.One commenter noted that the construction of roads and support facilitiesassociated with coal mining and exploration could have serious adverseeffects on historic properties. The commenter indicated that, under theserules, regulatory authorities would not adequately identify adverse effectsfor consideration during permit planning, review, and approval in orderto avoid or mitigate such effects. The commenter suggested that a new sectionbe inserted that would require a description of the methods to be usedto identify properties included in or eligible to be in the National Registerof Historic Places, and the efforts to be taken to prevent or control damageto such properties.OSMRE's regulations at 30 CFR Parts 731, 732, 761, 772, 773, 779, 780,783, and 784 (52 FR 4244-4263, February 10, 1987) include adequate provisionsfor the identification of historic properties and consideration of theeffects of all surface mining activities on such properties, includingthe design and construction of roads. To include these provisions in theperformance standards for roads, or for any other specific activity relatedto surface mining, would be redundant.Two commenters were concerned that, if the roads regulations were finalized,they would be applied retroactively. They suggested that retroactive compliancewould be expensive and actually could increase environmental harm due toreconstruction of existing roads. The commenters also suggested that OSMREclarify that the regulations apply prospectively to operators requestinga permit as of the date that a State adopts these final rules.OSMRE anticipates that these rules will be applied prospectively by a Stateafter a State has amended its regulatory program to be no less effectivethan these regulations. That is, a State would require proposed roads includedin a permit or permit revision application to comply with the roads regulationsadopted by the State pursuant to these Federal regulations. In accordancewith 30 CFR 701.11(e), existing roads that meet the performance standards,but not the design requirements, may be exempted from meeting design requirementsby the regulatory authority. Therefore, OSMRE does not anticipate thatregulatory authorities will require changes in existing roads if they meetenvironmental performance standards. Because proposed but not constructedroads included in permits approved prior to a State's adoption of rulespursuant to these regulations would comply with existing performance standardsand design requirements, OSMRE believes that extensive reworking of planswould not be required. One commenter contended that the proposed regulations do nothing for environmentalprotection other than to restate the existing performance standards containedwithin the regulatory program. The commenter went on to argue that theproposed regulations create an excessive amount of unnecessary paperworkfor industry and the rgulatory authorities. The commenter recommended thatthe proposed regulations should not become final. OSMRE disagrees because, even though general performance standards havealready been established in 30 CFR Subchapter K_Permanent Program PerformanceStandards, there is a significant need to have sections specific to thedesign, construction, reconstruction, improvement, and maintenance of roads.Roads can have a significant environmental impact if they are not properlymanaged and, with this in mind, OSMRE believes that the requirements outlinedin these rules justify the documentation required. B. Section 701.5 Definitions: Road The definition of <T3>road</T3> in final andSection; 701.5 is identical to that proposed onNovember 3, 1987 (52 FR 42265), except that the exemption of ``pioneerroads'' contained in the proposal has been deleted. The rule defines <T3>road</T3> to mean a surface right-of-way for purposes of travel byland vehicles, including mining equipment, used in surface coal miningand reclamation operations or coal exploration. The term <T3>road</T3> encompasses the entire area and structures within a surfaceright-of-way that is constructed, used, reconstructed, improved, or maintainedfor use in surface coal mining and reclamation operations or coal exploration,including use by coal hauling vehicles leading to transfer, processing,or storage areas. The term specifically excludes ramps and routes of travelwithin the immediate mining area (discussed below) and within excess spoilor coal mine waste disposal areas. The proposed rule excluded pioneer roads, defined in the proposal as ``temporaryroutes used for constructing access or haul roads,'' from the definitionof <T3>road</T3>. The preamble to the proposed rule explained that pioneerroads provide preliminary access for the construction of permanent accessand haul roads or equipment roads and not for mining purposes and thatthey are either replaced by a primary or ancillary road or reclaimed oncethey have fulfilled their purpose. The final rule does not retain the exclusion.OSMRE has reviewed the issue and believes that pioneer roads are not aseparate, discrete category of roads, but are merely part of the processof constructing primary and ancillary roads. Therefore, pioneer roads aresubject to the performance standards of this rule applicable to the constructionprocess but not to those that specify standards applicable to completedprimary or ancillary roads. The term ``immediate mining area'' refers to the area where coal is beingremoved from the seam and to other areas that should not be subject tothe performance standards for roads because they are subject to frequentsurface changes. These other areas include areas where topsoil and overburdenare being moved and areas undergoing active reclamation. OSMRE intendsthe term ``immediate mining area'' to refer to such areas of frequent surfacechange. Many areas in a mining operation contain routes of travel thatare moved every few days as the mining advances during coal removal andas the operator works in coal waste disposal and spoil areas. These routeshave a short life and are not included in the definition of road or subjectto the road performance standards, but would be subject to the other performancestandards applicable to all surface coal mining and recalamation operations.Temporary routes within spoil or coal mine waste disposal areas are excludedfrom the definition of <T3>road</T3> according to an agreement by the Secretary in <T3>Round II</T3> (slip op. at footnote 14). The industry plaintiffs contendedand OSMRE agreed that it was not reasonable to require roads within coalspoil and refuse disposal areas to be surfaced with nonacid- or nontoxic-formingsubstances, since these areas often contain acid- and toxic-forming materials.In addition, all of the surface drainage from these areas is controlledby siltation structures and treatment facilities, where necessary, to mitigateany potential adverse environmental effects.One commenter suggested revisions to the definitions of <T3>affected area</T3> and <T3>permit area</T3> in 30 CFR 701.5. The commenter wanted existing orproposed roads under the jurisdiction of a Federal land management agencyto be excluded from these definitions.The definitions of <T3>affected area</T3> and <T3>permit area</T3> are not part of this rulemaking. OSMRE believes thata revision to either of these definitions is not necessary. The definitionof <T3>road</T3> is clear on its own terms as to which roads are included.For this reason, a reference to <T3>affected area</T3> has not been included. On the specific concern relativeto Federal lands roads, neither this definition nor the definition of <T3>affected area</T3> as partially suspended (51 FR 41952, November 20,1986) is intended to expand or limit the jurisdictional reach of the definitionof ``surface coal mining operations'' contained in section 701(28)(B) ofthe Act, relative to roads. That jurisdictional reach must be determinedon a case-by-case basis by the regulatory authority.One commenter suggested that OSMRE retain the ``within the affected area''phrase in the definition of road to ensure that jurisdiction over existingroads under the control of a Federal land management agency is not transferredto the Secretary or to a State regulatory authority.As noted above, OSMRE does not agree that adding the phrase ``within theaffected area'' will affect jurisdiction over existing roads.One commenter requested that OSMRE restate its position with respect tothe definition of <T3>affected area</T3> and public roads. Another commenter suggested thatthe definition of <T3>road</T3> be modified to specifically exclude ``public roads.'' Thecommenter argued that roads maintained by public funds and located on propertiesdedicated to public entities are not roads as defined by andSection; 701.5and, even if the permittee so desired, could not be permitted since ownershipis not controlled.The definition of <T3>affected area</T3> is not a part of this rulemaking, nor is there anyreference to <T3>affected area</T3> in the definition of <T3>road</T3>. Similarly, there was no reference to roads in the 1979 definitionof <T3>affected area</T3> (44 FR 15317, March 13, 1979). The definition of<T3>affected area</T3> was modified in 1983 as it related to public roadsin order to address the practice in some states of operators constructingnew access roads and then deeding them to a public entity in order to keepthe operation less than two acres in area and thus avoid applicabilityof the Act for the entire mining operation (48 FR 14814, April 5, 1983).The litigation on this definition (<T3>In Re: Permanent Surface Mining Regulation Litigation</T3>, No. 79-1144(D.D.C. 1980)) also concerned the two-acre exemption, and the definitionof <T3>affected area</T3> was suspended insofar as it might limit jurisdictionover roads covered by the definition of ``surface coal mining operations.''(51 FR 41952, November 20, 1986) The two-acre exemption has since beeneliminated by Congress. Since the definition of <T3>affected area</T3> as partially suspended no longer provides additionalguidance as to which roads are included in the definition of ``surfacecoal mining operations,'' no reference to <T3>affected area</T3> is included in the definition of <T3>road</T3>.State laws vary widely in their road classification systems. OSMRE is concernedthat roads constructed to serve mining operations not avoid compliancewith the performance standards by being deeded to public entities. However,it is not OSMRE's intention automatically to extend jurisdiction over roadsinto the existing public road network. Jurisdiction under the Act and applicabilityof the performance standards are best determined on a case-by-case basisby the regulatory authority. For this reason, OSMRE did not accept thecommenter's suggestion that ``public roads'' be specifically excluded fromthe definition of <T3>road</T3>.Several commenters were concerned about the term ``immediate mining area''and expressed views concerning which roads within the mining area shouldbe excluded from the definition of <T3>road. </T3>One noted that roads leading to transfer, processing, orstorage areas would be subject to the design and performance standardsof andSection;780.37, yet routes within the immediate mining area are notconsidered roads under this definition. This commenter was unsure how OSMREdefines ``immediate mining area'' and argued that, if it is assumed that``immediate mining area'' includes any road within the permit area, thenthe definition would be self-defeating. A second commenter maintained thatthe use of the term ``within the immediate mining area'' in the exclusionpart of the definition of roads leaves the meaning open to varying interpretationssince the word ``immediate'' is undefined and vague.One commenter recommended that the definition of <T3>road </T3>exclude those access and haulroads that are located in areasthat have been mined and are upstream from sedimentation ponds or othersiltation structures that have been designed to contain or treat the runofffrom the 10-year, 24-hour precipitation event. Since these roads are inareas that already have been disturbed and all runoff from these areasis controlled, the commenter maintained that it is not necessary that theseroads meet the performance standards in andSection;816.150 and 816.151. Anothercommenter suggested excluding from the definition roads within the minearea unless a road is to be left as a permanent road and bond release isbeing sought in accordance with andSection;800.40. The suggested languagestated that roads shall be considered to be within the mine area only wherethe drainage from the road is commingled and treated with other mine drainagethrough approved sediment control structures. A fifth commenter suggestedthat the exclusion be limited to roads which are constructed within theportion of the permit area which is controlled by siltation structuresand treatment facilities as required by 30 CFR 816.46. The commenter alsosuggested that this language would give an exact meaning to the exclusionsince the area of the permit required to be controlled by siltation structureand treatment facilities is defined in 30 CFR 816.46. Another commenteragreed with the exclusion, but felt that it would extend to all roads withinthe mine area since their drainage is otherwise treated with that of therest of the mine. Another commenter was also concerned that roads withinthe mine area not frequently changing should not be included in the definition.OSMRE has not modified the rule in response to these wide-ranging comments.OSMRE intends the term ``immediate mining area'' to refer to the area ofthe mine that is subject to frequent surface changes and where the protectionrequired by section 515(b)(17) of the Act, concerning controlling or preventingerosion, siltation, pollution of water, damage to fish and wildlife ortheir habitat or to public or private property, is provided by other applicableperformance standards. The constraints of section 515(b)(18) of the Actwould not apply to this area because any serious alterations to the normalflow of water and impact on natural stream beds and drainage channels wouldhave already occurred. The term ``immediate mining area'' is not intendedto encompass the entire permit area and, therefore, would not create aself-defeating definition. OSMRE's view is in part consistent with theview expressed by several of the commenters concerning the exclusion ofroads within the permit area for which drainage control is otherwise provided.Since all of the other standards of section 515 of the Act would also necessarilyapply to temporary routes not considered roads, the protection requiredby section 515(b)(17) of the Act would still be achieved. However, OSMREhas retained the concept of frequent changes to ensure that all roads areadequately reclaimed. All routes subject to frequent changes will be obliteratedduring the mining process. However, routes no longer changing need to beincluded in the definition of <T3>road </T3>to ensure that they are adequately designed, constructed,maintained and reclaimed.One commenter maintained that the definition of roads arbitrarily restrictsthe applicability of the regulations for certain types of road disturbances,and argued that this is a clear contradiction of section 701(28) of theAct. The commenter stated that the deletion of pioneer and constructionroads from the roads definition is clearly unlawful. The commenter arguedthat the principal purpose of pioneer and construction roads is to gainaccess to the mine site. The commenter also noted that pioneer roads typicallydisturb virgin areas and can lead to greatly increased sedimentation froma mine site (especially on steep slopes). The commenter asserted that thiswas a loophole that offers a potential for substantial abuse. The commentermaintained that OSMRE must set out clearly in the record the performancestandards that must be met in the design, construction, and reclamationof pioneer roads. Two other commenters were concerned that the term ``pioneerroad'' is not defined in the regulations and may not be universally understood.It was suggested that OSMRE should either define the term ``pioneer road''or change the language in the definition of roads.In response to these comments, the provision excluding pioneer roads fromthe definition of <T3>road </T3>has been deleted from the rule. As indicated above, OSMREhas re-examined this issue and believes that pioneer roads are not a separate,discrete category of roads, but are part of the process of constructingprimary and ancillary roads. As such, pioneer roads are subject to theperformance standards applicable to the construction process such as thosein andSection;816.150(b)(1) through (6). The completed primary or ancillaryroad is subject to the remaining applicable performance standards.One commenter addressed the term ``pioneer roads'' in the context of roadsfor coal exploration. The commenter assumed that most exploration roadsare simply unsurfaced, cleared paths that allow access into the area foroff-road exploration equipment and would be considered ``pioneer roads''and, therefore, not subject to the road regulations. If this assumptionis correct, the commenter would support the current language with respectto coal exploration activities and pioneer roads.OSMRE has dropped the use of the term ``pioneer roads'' from the rule toavoid the kind of confusion reflected in the comment. All roads used forcoal exploration activities that substantially disturb the natural landsurface are subject to the standards of 30 CFR 816.150.One commenter agreed that temporary routes used for constructing accessor haulroads should be excluded from the definition of roads. However,the commenter noted that, just as temporary routes are sometimes used toconstruct roads, so are temporary routes used to construct any number ofstructures, such as sediment ponds, stockpiles, and so forth. The commentermaintained that these routes also should be excluded from the definition.OSMRE has deleted the exclusion for temporary routes that are part of theroad construction process. Temporary routes used to construct other typesof structures are, by definition, ancillary roads.One commenter suggested that the rule state that only those roads usedexclusively for the sole purpose of surface coal mining reclamation andexploration operations, should be included in the definition. The commenteralso suggested that the definition should state that only those accessand haulroads constructed, used, reconstructed, improved, <T3>and </T3>maintained are included. The commenter argued that this languagewould clearly show that the combination of these activities is necessaryin order for a road to be considered a ``road'' under the definition.OSMRE did not accept these suggestions, which are intended to limit thescope of the definition of <T3>road, </T3>because to do so would be inconsistent with the requirementsof section 515(b)(17) of the Act, which requires control or preventionof environmental harm from the construction, maintenance or postminingconditions of access roads into and across the site of operations.One commenter requested that OSMRE clarify the definition of <T3>road </T3>with respect to roads to and from transfer, processing, orstorage areas. The commenter maintained that all roads from these areaswould also fall under the definition of <T3>road</T3>.OSMRE agrees that roads to and from transfer, processing, or storage areasare included in this definition, if these roads fall within the definitionof ``surface coal mining operations.'' This will have to be determinedon a case-by-case basis consistent with the guidance previously statedin this preamble.C. Sections 780.37/784.24 Road SystemsFinal andSection; 780.37 is the same as the proposed rule, except for someminor wording changes discussed below, and contains permit applicationrequirements which specify the plans and drawings that an applicant isrequired to submit for each road within a proposed permit area. The sectionalso discusses certification of primary roads and the establishment ofstandard design plans by the regulatory authority.One commenter suggested that the requirements of andSection; 780.37 wouldaccomplish little more than additional excessive paperwork for industryand the regulatory authority because environmental protection could beaccomplished by requiring roads to meet the performance standards of theexisting regulations.OSMRE believes that the requirements of andSection; 780.37 are the minimumnecessary to provide the regulatory authority with the permit informationneeded to find that the performance standards promulgated with this rulewill be met so that a permit may be issued.Sections 780.37(a)/784.24(a) Plans and Drawings Final andSection; 780.37(a) requires the permit application to include plansand drawings for each road to be constructed, used, or maintained withinthe proposed permit area. OSMRE believes that the information in the plansand drawings enables the regulatory authority to assess the impacts resultingfrom any road that would be constructed or used as part of the surfacemining operation, and determine whether the operation and reclamation planwould be effective in mitigating as much of the cumulative impacts on theenvironment as possible, consistent with the purpose of the Act.Final andSection; 780.37(a)(1) requires the applicant to submit a map, andas appropriate, cross sections, design drawings, and specifications forroad widths, gradients, surfacing materials, cuts, fill embankments, culverts,bridges, drainage ditches, low-water crossings, and drainage structures.OSMRE expects that the amount of detail submitted by the applicant underthis section will be appropriate to the classification of the road andto the extent of the projected impact from the specific feature. For example,less detail will be required for an ancillary road than for a primary road,for which the drawings and specifications would be quite detailed.Final section (a)(2) requires drawings and specifications of each proposedroad that will be located in the channel of an intermittent or perennialstream to give the regulatory authority the information necessary to approvethe road, consistent with the performance standard in andSection; 816.150(d)(1),which was promulgated pursuant to section 515(b)(18) of the Act.Final andSection; 780.37(a)(3) requires that the drawings and specificationsfor each proposed ford of perennial or intermittent streams that will beused as a temporary route provide the regulatory authority with sufficientinformation to review the stream ford and decide whether to approve it,consistent with the performance standard in andSection; 816.151(c)(2). Aminor wording change, discussed below, was made in the final rule to makethe language in andSection; 780.37(a)(3) consistent with the language inandSection; 816.151(c)(2).Final andSection; 780.37(a)(4) requires a description of measures that theapplicant must take to obtain the approval of the regulatory authorityfor alteration or relocation of a natural stream channel, consistent withthe performance standard in proposed andSection; 816.151(d)(5). A minor wordingchange, discussed below, was made in the final rule to make the languagein andSection; 780.37(a)(4) consistent with the languag in andSection; 816.151(d)(5).Final andSection; 780.37(a)(5) requires drawings and specifications for eachlow-water crossing of perennial or intermittent streams, to enable theregulatory authority to maximize the protection of the stream in accordancewith the performance standard in andSection; 816.151(d)(6). A low-water crossingresembles a bridge in that water flows under the structure at normal streamlevel, but high water goes over the structure during storm or flood events.A minor word change, discussed below, was made in the final rule to makethe language in andSection; 780.37(a)(5) consistent with the language inandSection; 816.151(d)(6).Final andSection; 780.37(a)(6) requires information on the applicant's plansto remove and reclaim each road, and the schedule to be followed for roadreclamation, to ensure consistency with the performance standards. Thisinformation will not be required for a road that is proposed to be retainedfor use under an approved postmining land use.One commenter supported the new language for permit information requirementsfor roads and suggested that andSection; 780.37(a) provides needed informationfor the regulatory authorities to make an informed decision where an operatorproposes to place roads in stream courses or ford streambeds. Another commentersuggested a language change for andSection; 780.37 and other similar sectionsthat reference the preparation of plans, drawings, or maps. The commentersuggested that each section could include a sentence noting that theserequirements may be accomplished through the use of photogrammetric methodsfor aerial surveys and mapping.While these methods may be appropriate to fulfill some of the plans, drawings,and map requirements in the paragraph and other sections, OSMRE does notbelieve that photogrammetric methods need to be specifically referencedin a national rule. The States are free to specify the types of plans,drawings and maps that will be acceptable based on an assessment of thequality, reliability and availability of data provided by various methodsof data collection and presentation.One commenter maintained that the requirements in andSection; 780.37(a) areredundant and should be deleted because they are essentially found elsewherein the regulations. The commenter noted that 30 CFR 816.57 prohibits anyactivity within 100 feet of an intermittent or perennial stream unlessthat activity is approved by the regulatory authority and diversions ofperennial and intermittent streams, for any reason (including roads) arespecifically addressed by 30 CFR 816.43(b). The commenter argued furtherthat plans for diversions are required to be included in the permit by30 CFR 780.29, and the effects of all proposed activities on hydrologymust be addressed in the permit under 30 CFR 780.21(f).OSMRE does not agree that andSection; 780.37(a) is redundant. It containsthe requirement that the permit application include plans, drawings, maps,descrptions, and other information to enable the regulatory authority specificallyto assess the impacts resulting from roads that would be constructed orused as part of the surface mining operation relative to the specific performancestandards applicable to roads. These information requirements will enablethe regulatory authority to determine whether the operation and reclamationplan will be effective in mitigating the impacts specific to roads to ensurecompliance with those standards.One commenter asserted that there was insufficient protection for streamcourses and suggested that OSMRE set minimum standards for determiningallowable practices.OSMRE does not agree that further minimum standards are appropriate ina national rule, because such standards would fail to take into accountregional differences in the hydrologic characteristics of streams. Further,OSMRE believes that the information requirements of andSection; 780.37 providethe information necessary under the Act for regulatory authorities to usein making permit decisions concerning the location of roads in stream channels.Also, the performance standards for roads found in andSection;andSection; 816.150 and 816.151, along with the other general performance standardsfound in ``Subchapter K-Permanent Program Performance Standards,'' providesufficient protection for stream courses. Two commenters suggested that the technology used in andSection; 780.37(a)(2) through (5) should correspond to the terminology used in the performancestandards referenced by each paragraph.OSMRE agrees and has made the following changes to the rule. In andSection;780.37(a)(3), ``each proposed stream ford'' is replaced by ``each proposedford of perennial or intermittent streams'' to correspond to the languagein 30 CFR 816.151(c)(2). In andSection; 780.37(a)(4), ``natural drainageway''is replaced by ``natural stream channel'' to correspond to the langaugein 30 CFR 816.151(d)(5). In andSection; 780.37(a)(5),``each low-water crossing''is replaced by ``each low-water crossing of perennial or intermittent streamchannels'' to correspond to the language in 30 CFR 816.151(d)(6). Identicalchanges were made in andSection; 784.24(a)(3) to correspond to 30 CFR 817.151(c)(2),in andSection; 784.24(a)(4) to correspond to 30 CFR 817.151(d)(5), and inandSection; 784.24(a)(5) to correspond to 30 CFR 817.151(d)(6).Three commenters maintained that the requirement in andSection; 780.37(a)to prepare plans is burdensome, does not reflect the dynamic nature ofa mining operation, and does not produce a commensurate gain in environmentalprotection. The commenters suggested language changes and alternate conceptsthat included requiring only typical design plans, plans as appropriate,or only details for primary roads.OSMRE does not agree with the commenters. The information required forplans and drawings in andSection; 780.37(a) is necessary for the regulatoryauthority to assess the impacts expected from roads associated with a permitapplication. This evaluation of the efficacy of the proposed reclamationand operations plan in mitigating impacts on the environment is consistentwith the purposes of the Act. However, OSMRE expects that the amount ofdetail submitted in a permit application will be appropriate to the classificationof the road and its projected impacts.One commenter suggested that, where stream crossings are proposed, detailedplans for such crossings should be submitted so that the regulatory authoritycan evaluate the impacts of their construction.OSMRE agrees that this could be helpful to the regulatory authority, andthe regulatory authority has the flexibility to require this type of information.Section 780.37 requires the applicant to submit plans and drawings foreach road, including a map, appropriate cross sections, design drawingsand specifications for road widths, gradients, surfacing materials, cuts,fill embankments, culverts, bridges, drainage ditches, low-water crossingsand drainage structures.Four commenters suggested that the requirement in andSection; 780.37(a)(6)to describe road removal and reclamation and provide a schedule for thework should be deleted or clarified to ensure that the detail requiredfor the schedule would be commensurate with the dynamic nature of miningoperations. The commenters noted that, due to the variable nature of miningoperations, a schedule for road removal and reclamation would be speculativeat best.OSMRE recognizes the potential for changes in the road removal and reclamationplan and schedule as mining progresses. However, this potential for change,which is inherent in all plans and schedules, does not obviate the needto have this best-plan information available to the regulatory authorityduring permit review to ensure consistency with the performance standardsfound in 30 CFR 816.150(f).Sections 780.37(b)/784.24(b) Primary Road Certification This provision is identical to the proposed rule and requires that theplans and drawings for each primary road be prepared by or under the directionof a qualified registered professional engineer experienced in the designand construction of roads. It also requires that the engineer certify thatthe design meets the performance standards of 30 CFR Chapter VII, current,prudent engineering practices, and any design criteria estblished by theregulatory authority. The phase ``current, prudent engineering practices''includes those practices well-established by engineering principles andwidely recognized by experts with experience in the subject. Section 780.37(b) also allows design and certification by a qualified registeredprofessional land surveyor experienced in the design and construction ofroads in any State which authorizes land surveyors to certify the designof primary roads. This provision is based on the November 4, 1983, amendmentsto the Act which authorize land surveyors to prepare and certify crosssections, maps, and plans (Sec. 115, Pub. L. 98-146, 97 Stat. 938 (1983)).The amendment provides that ``not withstanding section 507(b)(14) of theSurface Mining and Reclamation Act of 1977 (Pub. L. 95-87), cross sections,maps, or plans of land to be affected by an application for surface miningand reclamation permit shall be prepared by or under the direction of aqualified registered professional engineer or geologist, or qualified registeredprofessional land surveyor in any State which authorizes land surveyorsto prepare and certify such maps or plans.'' Before a land surveyor couldcertify the design of a primary road under this rule, State law also wouldhave to grant corresponding authority. One commenter indicated support for andSection; 780.37(b), which reflectsthe 1983 amendment to the Act initiated by the surveying profession authorizinga qualified registered professional land surveyor to design and certifyplans and drawings for each primary road. Two comments maintained that, at the time of permit application preparation,an operator may not have determined the precise location and design ofa road or may not have sufficient site-specific field information to certifythe plans and drawings for a primary road. They suggested that OSMRE changethe language in andSection; 780.37(b) to allow for the submission of detaileddesign and plans prior to construction, instead of requiring submissionwith the permit application. They noted that this would reduce the likelihoodof permit modifications later during the duration of the operation. Ina related comment, it was suggested that andSection; 780.37 contain a provisionrequiring submission to the regulatory authority by the permittee of updatedplans and drawings to account for changes in the location or design ofroads. OSMRE did not accept the suggestion that the final rule allow submissionof detailed design and plans at the time of road construction. OSMRE believesthat in order to adequately assess the impacts of the roads planned foran operation, the regulatory authority needs the information required inandSection; 780.37(b) during the initial permit review. This is particularlyimportant for primary roads due to the potential for environmental impactassociated with their frequency or length of usage. Also, OSMRE anticipatesthat sufficient information will be present in the permit application packageto ensure compliance with the appropriate performance standards. OSMREdid not accept the suggestion that the final rule require the submissionof updated plans and drawings to account for changes in the location ordesign of roads. If changes occur, they must be incorporated into the permitby the normal permit revision process established in 30 CFR Part 774. One commenter did not agree with the language that authorizes land surveyorsto certify plans and drawings for roads. The commenter maintained thatthe design of roads was outside the field of expertise of land surveyors.OSMRE recognizes that not all land surveyors have adequate expertise tocertify plans and drawings for road designs, and therefore requires thatthe registered professional land surveyor be ``qualified and experiencedin the design and construction of roads.'' This requirement, along withthe requirement for State authorization of surveyor certification of roaddesign, is sufficient to ensure that certifying land surveyors will haveappropriate expertise to certfiy plans and drawings for roads. One commenter argued that the certification requirement in andSection; 780.37(b)was unnecessary and should be deleted. The commenter noted that since theroads were part of the permit area, they were already completed by a qualifiedengineer or land surveyor and, therefore, must comply with the approvedmining plan and performance standards. The commenter argued further thatrequiring post-construction certification of roads creates additional unnecessarypaperwork with no net environmental protection. OSMRE does not agree with the commenter and believes the design certificationrequirement for primary roads is necessary because the potential for environmentalimpacts from primary roads can be significant. By requiring certificationthat the design of primary roads meets the requirements of the Act, thepotential problems associated with design of primary roads will be minimized.Two commenters suggested that geologists be authorized to certify plansand drawings for primary roads. They noted that the November 4, 1983, amendmentto the Act allows cross sections, maps, or plans of land to be affectedby an application for surface mining and reclamation permit to be preparedby or under the direction of a qualified registered professional geologist.OSMRE did not accept this suggestion because the existing authority ofgeologists is not affected by this rulemaking; therefore, their authorityfor preparing and certifying cross sections, maps and plans has not changedsince 1985 (50 FR 16195, April 24, 1985).One commenter suggested that ancillary roads should also be designed andcertified by a qualified professional to ensure proper drainage controland stability of road embankments.OSMRE did not accept this suggestion. It is not necessary to require designcertification of ancillary roads because usage of ancillary roads has smallerpotential for adverse environmental impact than usage of primary roads.Ancillary roads are subject to relatively infrequent use by smaller, lighterweight vehicles. See the discussion of the road classification system inthe preamble to final andSection; 816.150(a)(1).Sections 780.37(c)/784.24(c) Standard Design PlansFinal andSection; 780.37(c) is identical to the proposed rule and allowsthe regulatory authority to establish engineering design standards forprimary roads through the State program approval process, in lieu of theengineering tests that otherwise would be performed to establish compliancewith the minimum static safety factor of 1.3, for all primary road embankments.Such standards must be no less effective than the minimum static safetyfactor of 1.3. Suitable engineering design standards are those that areaccepted in the engineering community as the basis for constructing stableroads, and are known to assure proper performance through testing and pastpractice. This provision enables the regulatory authority and the operatorto save time and effort during the design and review of road plans, andalso ensures protection of the environment through the application of standardsthat have proven effective for the conditions prevalent in each State.Three commenters supported proposed andSection; 780.37(c). They noted that,by allowing the regulatory authority to establish or use engineering designstandards instead of engineering tests, andSection; 780.37(c) reinforcesthe Act's finding in section 101(f) that, because of the diversity in terrain,climate, biologic, chemical, and other physical conditions in areas subjectto mining operations, the primary governmental responsibility for developing,authorizing, issuing, and enforcing regulations for surface mining andreclamation operations should rest with the States.D. Sections 780.38/784.30 Support FacilitiesFinal andSection; 780.38 addresses the specific permit application requirementsfor all support facilities covered by andSection; 816.181 of the performancestandards. A permit applicant must submit a description, plans and drawingsfor each facility to be constructed, used or maintained within the proposedpermit area. The plans and drawings include a map, appropriate cross sections,design drawings, and specifications sufficient to demonstrate compliancewith andSection; 816.181 for each facility. The final rule is adopted asproposed.This rule expands new andSection; 780.38 to cover support facilities in general.Although existing 30 CFR Part 780 contains a number of requirements applicableto support facilities, the existing rules do not contain a general requirementthat a permit application include plans and drawings for support facilitiesthat would be sufficient to demonstrate compliance with andSection; 816.181.To remedy this deficiency, andSection; 780.38 applies to all support facilitiesin addition to the conveyors and rail systems covered by previous andSection;780.37.One commenter objected to proposed andSection; 780.38 because it appearedto the commenter to consider roads associated with support facilities tobe distinct from roads regulated by andSection;andSection; 816.150 and 816.151.The commenter stated that the preamble provided no justification for distinguishingroads associated with support facilities as distinct from roads associatedwith the surface coal mining operation since the same equipment uses bothroads. For this reason, the commenter continued, all roads should be designedand maintained under a uniform set of performance standards and reclaimedto permanent program standards.OSMRE agrees that this rule should not distinguish roads associated withsupport facilities from other roads. The definition of <T3>road</T3> in final andSection;701.5 includes all roads that are usedin surface coal mining and reclamation operation without differentiatingbetween roads for support facilities and roads for coal mining operations.Section 780.37 as well as the performance standards in andSection;andSection;816.150 and 151 apply to all roads at the coal mining operation includingthose associated with support facilities. Therefore, all roads must bedesigned and maintained under a uniform set of performance standards andreclaimed to permanent program standards.The same commenter also stated that proposed andSection; 780.38 appearedto remove support facilities, including conveyors and rail systems, fromthe permit information requirements and permanent program performance standardsthat were applicable for these facilities under the 1983 rule and wouldbe applicable to roads under the proposed rule. The commenter stated thatandSection; 780.38 must be substantially rewritten to ensure that conveyorsand rail systems in particular, and all support facilities in general,meet all permanent program application and performance standard requirements.OSMRE disagrees with the commenter's assessment of the purpose and effectof this final rule. The final rule does not change or affect in any waythe performance standards for support facilities. The rule brings the formatof the permit information requirements into harmony with the format ofthe performance by placing the permit information requirements and performancestandards for roads and support facilities in separate, parallel sections.OSMRE also disagrees that andSection; 780.38 should be rewritten to indicatemore clearly the performance standards applicable to support facilities.In fact, andSection; 780.38 certifies the performance standards applicableto support facilities (including rail systems and conveyors) by groupingthe permit information requirements and the associated performance standardreference in the same place. Previously, the permit applicant would havehad to search through andSection; 780.37 to determine the requirements applicablejust to roads and those applicable to both support facilities and roads.One commenter stated that the title of andSection;780.38 should be ``OtherTransportation Facilities'' since that is the section's topic of discussion.OSMRE did not accept this comment. Since the permitting requirements establishedby this section cover all support facilities, and parallel and referencethe performance standards in andSection;816.181, concerning support facilities,the title is appropriate. Two commenters requested that andSection;780.38 be withdrawn from this rulemakingbecause OSMRE has not defined ``support facilities,'' and it is thereforepremature for OSMRE to adopt this rule. They also stated that the proposalsubstantially changes the scope of this rule from roads and conveyors toall facilities. They stated that it was not possible to comment on andSection;780.38without any guidance on what constitutes a support facility until it isdefined in the rules. Finally, the commenters suggested that States arecapable of determining those facilities related to coal mining that shouldbe regulated under their regulatory programs and establishing appropriateperformance standards as necessary. OSMRE agrees in part and disagrees in part. First, effective July 11, 1988,OSMRE reinstated the suspended definition of <T3>support facilities </T3>(53 FR 21764, June 9, 1988) pursuant to theJanuary 29, 1988 decision of the U.S. Court of Appeals for the Districtof Columbia Circuit (<T3>NWF </T3>v. <T3>Hodel</T3>). However, OSMRE agrees that State regulatory authoritiesare capable of identifying facilities that should be subject to the provisionsof the Act without having a definition of support facilities in the Federalregulations. Therefore, OSMRE has proposed to delete the recently reinstateddefinition of <T3>support facilities </T3>from 30 CFR 701.5 (53 FR 23522, June 22, 1988).However, whether there is or is not a Federal definition of <T3>support facilities </T3>is irrelevant to this rule, the purpose ofwhich is to specify more clearly the link between permit information requirementsfor such facilities and the applicable performance standards, which arenot part of this rulemaking. The information required in andSection;780.38is needed to demonstrate compliance by each facility with 30 CFR 816.181.One commenter stated that andSection;780.38 was unnecessary because sufficientinformation is authorized in the existing regulations to show the locationand dimensions of all support areas within the permit boundary; therefore,the proposed rule does little more than reinforce the existing regulations.OSMRE disagrees that andSection;780.38 is unnecessary because although existing30 CFR Part 780 contains a number of requirements which may be applicableto support facilities, the existing rules do not contain a specific requirementthat a permit application include plans and drawings for support facilitiesthat would be sufficient to demonstrate compliance with andSection;816.181.By specifying the degree of detail that is needed in each permit application,andSection;780.38 provides clear direction to the applicant. E. Section 815.15(b) Road Standards for Coal Exploration Final andSection;815.15(b) requires all roads or other transportation facilitiesused for coal exploration to comply with the applicable provisions of 30CFR 816.150, 816.180, and 816.181. The final rule is unchanged from theproposal. OSMRE believes that it is not necessary for roads used for coal explorationto meet the performance standards of andSection;816.151 for primary roadsbecause the amount of coal or spoil transported during coal explorationoperations is relatively small. OSMRE believes that the performance standardsof andSection;816.150 provide sufficient protection for the environment duringcoal exploration. Under section 512(a) of the Act, 30 CFR 815.15 appliesonly to ``coal exploration activities which substantially disturb the naturalland surface.'' Thus, a road must comply with the applicale provisionsof 30 CFR 816.150 only to the extent that the coal exploration activitiessubstantially disturb the land where the road is located. OSMRE has definedthe term <T3>substantially disturb </T3>in 30 CFR 701.5. One commenter supported the language in andSection;815.15(b) because, inthe commenter's opinion, it allows the regulatory authority some flexibilityin deciding if a coal exploration road should be designed and constructedto primary road standards. The commenter stated that, since these roadsare generally used for only a short time during coal exploration activities,especially when 250 tons or less of coal is removed, the design and constructionof a road to such stringent standards is not necessary. OSMRE disagrees with the commenter's assessment of the applicability ofthe rule. The rules adopted today do not apply the primary road performancestandards in andSection;816.151 to coal exploration activities. Furthermore,the coal exploration regulations do not require prior approval of roadswhen 250 tons or less of coal is to be removed. Another commenter stated that OSMRE has a responsibility to set nationalstandards for roads associated with coal exploration, regardless of theamount of coal removed from the site. The commenter suggested that haulroadsfor coal exploration in steep-slope areas have the potential for environmentaldamage and require standards to ensure that environmental damage causedby construction and use of these roads is minimized. The commenter alsostated that OSMRE has no basis for the arugment that specific design standardsonly apply to primary roads because OSMRE has a statutory responsibilityto provide meaningful national standards for all surface coal mining andreclamation operations. The commenter concluded that meaningful nationalstandards for roads associated with coal exploration sites should be adoptedin the final rule. OSMRE has included a full discussion on the necessity of promulgating specificdesign standards for mining roads in the discussion of andSection;816.150.Neither section 512 nor section 515 of the Act requires the establishementof design standards for coal exploration roads. The requirement in andSection;816.150(c)that the road shall incorporate appropriate limits for grade, width, surfacematerials, surface drainage control, culvert placement and culvert size,and any necessary design criteria established by the regulatory authoritywill provide adequate environmental protection to the area of coal explorationactivities. Enforcement of these provisions will provide the necessaryprotection in steep-slope areas.   One commenter recommended that the term <T3>substantially disturbed </T3>in 30 CFR 701.5 be changed to excludethe construction of a road for coal exploration activities proposing toremove less than 250 tons of coal. OSMRE does not agree that the construction of a road for such coal explorationactivities could not involve ``substantial disturbance.'' The determinationof when ``substantial disturbance'' has occurred must be made on a site-by-sitebasis. OSMRE does not believe the routine maintenance of an existing roadused for coal exploration is a substantial disturbance requiring the roadto be reclaimed in accordance with the preformance standards of section515 of the Act. To use an existing road that is in poor condition due tolack of maintenance, a coal exploration operator may need to blade theroad surface, replace some culverts, or do other minor routine maintenance.Such routine maintenance of an existing road would not be considered substantialdisturbance of the natural land surface that would require reclamationof the road. Further, in some cases coal exploration activities are conductedwithout roads and in such a manner that the activities do not substantiallydisturb the natural land surface. F. Sections 816.150/817.150 Roads: General Final andSection;816.150 applies to all roads as defined by 30 CFR 701.5.It includes a road classification system, performance standards, designand construction limits, provision for design criteria, and provisionson road location, maintenance, and reclamation. Section 816.150 is identicalto the proposed rule except for a clarifying change to andSection;816.150(b)(1)adopted at the request of EPA and minor changes to andSection;816.150(d)(1)and (f). Sections 816.150(a)/817.150(a) Road Classification System Final andSection;816.150(a) is identical to the proposed rule and establishesclassifications for all mine roads as either primary or ancillary. Primaryroads are defined as any roads(1) used for transporting coal or spoil,(2) frequently used for access or other purposes for a period in excessof six months, or (3) to be retained for an approved postmining land use.An ancillary road is any road not classified as a primary road. OSMRE believesthat the potential for environmental harm associated with the two typesof roads is sufficiently different to require a two-tiered classificationsystem. Roads that are heavily travelled over a long period of time; usedby large, heavy vehicles; or that have a potential for spillage have agreater potential for environmental harm than roads that are used infrequentlyby small, light vehicles or for short periods of time. This concept issupported by OSMRE`s experience and observations over the past ten yearsoperating a regulatory program. Each of the factors that distinguish primary roads from ancillary roadsis related to an increased potential for environmental harm. Roads usedfor haulage of coal, overburden, spoil, etc. are classified as primaryroads under the final rules. These roads are typically used by large, heavyvehicles. In order to accommodate such vehicles, the road must be wide,generaly involving two lanes of traffic, and its surface must be capableof supporting the weight of the traffic. A wide road involves much moreearthmoving in its construction and exposes more surface area, increasingthe potential for erosion. On heavily travelled roads, provision must bemade for vehicles to pass one another safely. The design manuals recommendwider lanes where the ability of vehicles to pass one another is a concern.See Kaufman and Ault, pp. 30-33. On less travelled roads, a single lanewould suffice. The increased potential for environmental harm associatedwith frequently travelled roads derives from the greater surface area exposedand the greater dust entrainment associated with larger vehicles and thegreater volume of traffic. Roads with a higher weight bearing capacityrequire a thicker subbase, so that more material must be excavated, placedand compacted in constructing the road. Design manuals recommend that roads used by large haulage vehicles, forexample, in the 100,000-200,000 pound range, minimize the severity of roadgrades. See Kaufman and Ault, pp. 8-11. Building roads to accommodate heaviervehicles, therefore, often requires substantial cut and fill work to limitmaximum and sustained grades in addition to providing adequate width forwide vehicles to safely pass. Also, since there is a certain amount ofcargo spillage associated with haulage roads, the potential for erosion,siltation or damage to property or wildlife habitat is greater for suchprimary roads due to loose coal, coal waste or spoil on the road surface.Roads not used for haulage will not typically generate this potential problem.Under the classification system, primary roads also include roads frequentlyused for a period in excess of six months. This factor is included dueto the increased risk of environmental harm associated with heavy trafficover long periods of time. Duration of road use is also an important predictorof potential environmental harm. The longer a road exists, the greaterpotential for slips or grade failures as well as other impacts previouslymentioned. In OSMRE's experience, the potential for erosion and siltationas well as road grade failures is quite seasonal, normally occurring inearly spring. Especially in the Eastern U.S., the increased precipitationassociated with this period combined with frequent freezing and thawingtends to degrade road beds as well as the surface. However, such problemsare frequently not evident in the first season. Moreover, roads used lessthan six months will frequently not even be in place during this season.Therefore, OSMRE believes, due to the increased risk of environmental harm,that longer term roads must be subject to the more stringent primary roaddesign and performance standards. OSMRE strongly believes that differentiatingbetween potentially greater or lesser environmental impacts in developingregulatory requirements is fully consistent with the requirement in section102 of the Act to establish a program to protect society and the environmentand to strike a balance between protection of the environment and the nation'sneed for coal. OSMRE is basing these road provisions, in part, on ten yearsof experience enforcing the surface mining regulatory program. OSMRE believesthat these standards are both necessary and adequate to achieve the purposesof the Act. Ancillary roads are all roads not designated as primary. Ancillary roadsare subject to relatively infrequent use by smaller, lighter weight vehicles.Consequently, the potential severity and risk of harm from use by suchvehicles is smaller. OSMRE has not identified specific types of roads inthe rule as ancillary because it would not be possible to make an all-inclusivelist. Examples of ancillary roads are those which provide access to airshafts, sediment ponds, and locations for hydrologic sampling, equipmentmaintenance, monitoring, or other similar uses. One commenter supported the concept of two classifications for roads aswell as the handling of performance standards in general terms. The commenternoted that this gives the regulatory authority more discretion in managingpermitting and enforcement programs.   One commenter suggested that all roads outside the area controlled by siltationstructures and treatment facilities be considered primary roads.OSMRE did not accept this suggestion because it is unnecessarily rigid.Such a system for designating primary roads would entail substantial design,construction and maintenance costs without, in many cases, a concomitantreduction in potential environmental harm.Some commenters were concerned that the proposed two-tiered system wasoverly simplistic, especially with resepct to limited use roads that existfor extended periods of time. The commenters felt that such roads wouldbe inappropriately considered primary roads. OSMRE does not agree that the two-tiered system is overly simplistic, nordoes it agree that a ``simple'' system is necessarily inferior to a ``complex''one. The final rule balances environmental protection, safety and roadstability against design, construction and maintenance costs while providingthe flexibility to address a multitude of varying site conditions. Underthe final rule, infrequently used acess roads that will be in existencefor an extended period of time will be considered ancillary roads. Numerous commenters voiced their concerns about how the elements of thedefinition of primary road in andSection; 816.150(a)(2) would be interpreted.Regarding the criterion in andSection; 816.150(a)(2)(i) that roads used fortransporting coal or spoil are primary roads, there was concern that abona fide ancillary road would automatically be classified as a primaryroad if a pickup truck loaded with coal used the road. OSMRE did not modify the regulation in response to this concern becauseit is confident that such situations rarely, if ever, arise and that regulatoryauthorities will use reasoned judgement in applying the definition to achieveits intended purpose. Roads used for coal and spoil transportation mustbe considered primary roads because of the generally large trucks used,the high frequency of trips, the potential for spillage of coal or spoilonto the road surface, and the fact that coal and spoil transport occursthroughout the life of the operation.Concerning the frequency of use criterion contained in andSection; 816.150(a)(2)(ii),a commenter suggested that the word ``frequently'' be dropped because someinfrequently used road could cause more environmental harm than coal haulroads.It was also suggested that frequency be defined. OSMRE did not drop the frequency element from the definition of primaryroad because it believes that frequency of use is a key predictor, alongwith duration of use, of potential environmental harm. OSMRE did not adda definition of ``frequently used'' to the final rule because it is notpossible or advisable in a national rule to devise a definition that willfairly address all sets of circumstances. Whether a road is ``frequentlyused'' is a determination that should be made at ground level on a case-by-casebasis taking into account the probable environmental consequences of theanticipated level of use and the types of vehicles expected to use theroad. As an example, OSMRE considers that a road used only once or twiceeach day, or once or twice each shift, for access to a structure housinga fan or ventilator (fan house) for the purpose of monitoring and/or maintenancewould not be a ``frequently used'' road. Concerning the duration of use criterion in andSection; 816.150(a)(2)(ii),it was suggested that the six-month period should be deleted and that theprimary road definition should better reflect the type of vehicular useand primary purpose of the road. It was argued further that access andservice roads used in excess is six months would be classified as primaryroads thus burdening the operator with unnecessary design and performancerequirements.The concern that the primary road definition should better reflect thetype of vehicular use and primary purpose of the road is addressed in theprevious discussion explaining the basis for the road classification system.As to which roads are classified as primary, the commenter may have misunderstoodthe proposed regulation. Duration of use is a key predictor of a road'spotential for environmental harm. It is generally recognized that the longera road is used, the greater the potential for stability problems and erosion.However, an infrequently used road of more than six months duration (whichis not used to haul coal or spoil, and which will not be retained for postminingland use) is unlikely to cause significant environmental harm and, thus,is not classified as a primary road. The six-month limit establishes areasonable balance between long- and short-term use. Three commenters suggested that OSMRE revise the road classification systemin andSection; 816.150(a)(2)(iii) as it relates to roads that will be retainedfor an approved postmining land use. The commenters argued that retaininga road for a approved postmining land use should not be a determining factorin classifying the road because to do so would subject the road to performancestandards that could be unrelated to the use of the road during the miningoperation. They felt that the classification should be determined solelyby the purpose and frequency of use of the road during mining. The samecommenters were also concerned about how changes in the status of a roadwould be handled, e.g. a road classified as ancillary during the miningoperation becomes a primary road when the operator retains the road aftermining and reclamation is completed.OSMRE did not accept the commenters' arguments and continues to believethat roads which are to be retained for an approved postmining land useshould be considered primary roads and be subject to the associated performancestandards. OSMRE bases this belief on the fact that after final bond release,protection from the future environmental consequences of road use and maintenanceunder the Act ceases. The operator has no responsibility for subsequentadverse environmental impacts related to the road's use and maintenance.In order to provide a reasonable assurance of environmental protectionafter the site has been reclaimed, and in the absence of an operator, OSMREbelieves that postmining roads must be designed and constructed in compliancewith the more stringent primary road standards. This will ensure, as faras possible, that the location, design, construction and maintenance ofthe road during mining operations will have minimum adverse impacts afterreclamation. Concerning changes in the classification of a road, OSMREbelieves that the regulatory authority must approve such changes basedon the road's compliance with all standards applicable to the road.One commenter suggested that performance standards are unnecessary becauseprimary roads are required as part of any operation, and the regulationsare only a duplication of existing performance standards.OSMRE does not agree. These regulations and performance standards specificto roads are necessary to insure that all roads are properly classified,that potential environmental impact of the roads are adequately evaluatedand that roads are located, designed, constructed, reconstructed, maintained,and reclaimed so as to minimize their environmental impacts.One commenter maintained that some of the requirements for primary roadswould be burdensome to small operators. The commenter noted that at smalloperations, the equipment used to transport the coal may only include smalltrucks of limited capacity. The commenter suggested that some allowanceor exception should be made whereby use of a road to transport coal doesnot automatically cause it to be a primary road.OSMRE understands the commenter's concern for small operators. However,as discussed above, OSMRE has concluded that roads used for transportingcoal or spoil have a potential for environmental damage regardless of whethertheir use is frequent or long-term. Therefore, roads used for transportingcoal or spoil have been included in the definition of primary roads andare subject to more stringent performance standards. It should be notedthat OSMRE expects that road design will reflect the anticipated road durationand usage.One commenter indicated that the term ``ancillary road'' requires a betterdefinition. The commenter was concerned because of the lack of any permittingor reclamation requirements for ancillary roads.OSMRE disagrees that ``ancillary road'' is poorly defined. Taken together,the definition of <T3>road</T3> at andSection; 701.5 and the definition of primary road atandSection; 816.150(a)(2) delineate ancillary road with a degree of specificityappropriate to a national rule given the variety of roads associated withmining operations. The permit information and reclamation requirementsspecifically associated with ancillary roads are found in andSection;andSection;780.37 and 816.150, respectively.One commenter recommended that the classification system be changed toaccount for the diversity in service life and uses of mine roads. Thiscommenter also suggested that designs should be prepared by qualified professionals.OSMRE agrees that some form of categorization of roads is necessary fromboth the environmental and economic points of view due to the diversityof road uses and types associated with mining operations, but did not makeany change in the final rule because the road classification system beingadopted today explicitly differentiates between the two types of roadson the basis of purpose and frequency of use. Further, andSection; 780.37requires the plans and drawings for each primary road to be prepared by,or under the direction of, qualified professionals. Because the risk ofenvironmental harm from ancillary roads is less than that from primaryroads, the added expense for design and construction certification by aregistered professional is not appropriate. One commenter felt that andSection; 816.150(a) should explicitly excludepublic roads. OSMRE disagrees. The applicability of these standards to public roads isdiscussed elsewhere in this preamble. One commenter objected to the distinctions made between primary and ancillaryroads for determining which roads have to meet specific performance standards.The commenter maintained that OSMRE has failed to meet the mandate of theAct by not establishing specific design criteria for all roads includingancillary roads, because of the potential for environmental damage. Thecommenter did not accept OSMRE's position that ancillary roads do not causeas much damage as primary roads. The commenter maintained that OSMRE isusing the classification system to allow an exception from the statutorystandards for ancillary roads. The commenter was particularly concernedwith the potential environmental damage caused by ancillary roads in steep-slopeareas. Another commenter questioned the need to classify all mine roads as eitherprimary or ancillary on the basis of purpose and frequency of use. Thecommenter argued that all roads, regardless of their intended purpose orfrequency of use, retain similar potential for environmental damage ifthey are not designed, constructed, maintained or reclaimed properly. Thecommenter maintained that the additional requirements in andSection; 816.151are essentially the best management practices that should apply to allroads in order to achieve the performance standards contained in andSection;816.150(b). The commenter contended that the two-tiered classificationsystem would result in less attention being paid to ancillary roads, whichare more numerous in a mining operation than primary roads. OSMRE believes that the road classification system established in andSection;816.150(a) appropriately distinguishes between primary roads, which needmore detailed consideration in their design, construction, maintenance,and reclamation; and ancillary roads, which are likely to be small andwould generally not be used for carrying heavy loads. The basis for thedistinction is that the potential severity and risk of harm associatedwith smaller, less used (ancillary) roads is considerably less than thatassociated with larger, busier (primary) roads. Ancillary roads are notexempted from performance standards; all roads, including ancillary roads,must comply with the standards of andSection; 816.150, which is an expansionof the statutory standards contained in section 515(b) (17) and (18) ofthe Act. Sections 816.150(b)/817(b) Performance Standards Final andSection; 816.150(b) establishes performance standards that operatorsmust meet when locating, designing constructing, reconstructing, using,maintaining, and reclaiming roads associated with surface coal mining operationsas defined by 30 CFR 701.5. Section 816.150(b) is identical to the proposedrule except for a clarifying change to andSection; 816.150(b)(1) adoptedat the request of EPA. The change is discussed below in the responses tocomments. The performance standard in section (b)(1) requires the control or preventionof erosion, siltation, and the air pollution attendant to erosion, includingroad dust as well as dust occuring on the other exposed surfaces, by measuressuch as vegetating, watering, using chemical or other dust suppressantsor otherwise stabilizing all exposed surfaces in accordance with current,prudent engineering practices. The standards in sections (b) (2) through (7) require an operator to controlor prevent damage to fish, wildlife, or their habitat and related environmentalvalues; control or prevent additional contributions of suspended solidsto stream flow or runoff outside the permit area; neither cause nor contribute,directly or indirectly, to the violation of State or Federal water qualitystandards applicable to receiving waters; refrain from seriously alteringthe normal flow of water in streambeds or drainage channels; prevent orcontrol damage to public or private property, including the preventionor mitigation of adverse effects to lands within the boundaries of unitsof the National Park System, the National Wildlife Refuge System, the NationalSystem of Trails, the National Wilderness Preservation System, the Wildand Scenic Rivers system, including designated study rivers, and NationalRecreation Areas designated by Act of Congress; and prohibit the use ofacidic or toxic substances in road surfacing. One commenter felt that andSection; 816.150 fails to provide meaningful,.national standards for the design, construction, maintenance, and reclamationof roads. The commenter referred to a discussion of the need for detailedperformance standards in the preamble to the 1979 final rule where OSMREstated, in part, that there were many comments recommending that OSMRE``limit the Federal performance standards to generalized guidelines andsuggestions which would then serve as the nucleus for the State regulatoryauthorities to develop standards unique to local conditions.'' In responseto these recommendations, OSMRE ``determined that such general standards,incorporating broad interpretation capabilities, would not be consistentwith the intent of the Act or the rest of the regulatory scheme'' (44 FR14901, 15246, March 13, 1979). The commenter suggested that the proposedrule was inconsistent with the position expressed in 1979. Where it is appropriate to ``flesh out'' portions of the Act in the implementingregulations, OSMRE has not hesitated to do so. OSMRE believes that andSection;816.150 does provide sufficient national standards for the design, construction,maintenance, and reclamation of roads, while allowing consideration ofthe variations in site-specific conditions that can be encountered at differentoperations throughout the coal fields. These standards necessarily allowthe regulatory authority the flexibility to identify the measures thatare appropriate for the site-specific characteristics of each surface coalmining operation. In 1979, OSMRE has less then one year of experience regulatingsurface coal mining operations. Now, after ten years of experience, mostof that in oversight of approved State programs, which deal with roadsquite effectively, but through quite varied approaches, OSMRE feels thatthe expansion of the statutory language being promulgated today is fullyadequate the ensure that statutory standards are met.The same commenter and another commenter particularly noted the removalof the phrase ``minimize the diminution to or degradation of the qualityor quantity of surface and ground-water systems'' from andSection; 816.150(b)(5)of the 1983 rule. The commenters suggested that specific language for protectionof both quantity and quality of surface and groundwater systems from adverseimpacts of roads should be reinstated into the final rule. A third commenterwas concerned that the water quality and quantity provisions removed fromandSection; 816.150(b)(5) of the remanded and suspended 1983 regulationswere not adequately covered in other regulations. OSMRE did not propose a provision specifically addressing the impact ofroads on the quantity and quality of surface and groundwater systems, suchas that contained in the remanded and suspended 1983 rule. Adequate standardsto ensure compliance with section 515(b)(17) of the Act are provided bythe other provisions of andSection;andSection; 816/817.150(b) and by 30 CFR780.21 and 784.14. After considering the comments, OSMRE does not believethat adding such a standard specifically for roads would add to the effectivenessof this rule. One commenter suggested that the final rule should be clarified to ensurethat it includes performance standards for roads that will protect allprivate property from damage. The commenter wanted to insure that all privateproperties are protected and not just those areas listed in section 522(e)of SMCRA. Another commenter argued that inserting into andSection; 816.150(b)(6)the lands listed in section 522(e)(1) of the Act inserts unsuitabilitycriteria into this performance standard. The commenter maintained thatOSMRE lacks authority to include the list in andSection; 816.150(b)(6). Twocommenters suggested that the list be deleted because these lands alreadyhave provisions for special consideration. Final andSection;816.150(b)(6) requires the operator to protect both privateproperty and public property, placing special emphasis on certain typesof public property. OSMRE has enumerated those areas covered by the miningprohibitions of section 522(e)(1) of the Act to ensure that special considerationis given these public properties. This enumeration does not remove theoperator's requirement to protect other public property or private propertyas required by section 515(b)(17). OSMRE does not agree that includingthe list of areas covered by section 522(e)(1) of the Act in andSection;816.150(b)(6) constitutes an insertion of unsuitability criteria. OSMREbelieves that inclusion of these specific areas in andSection; 816.150(b)(6)appropriately emphasizes the importance attached to such areas by Congressin drafting the Act, without providing less protection for other publicand private property under this provision. One commenter was concerned that andSection; 816.150(b) would require thereconstruction of existing permitted roads causing extensive environmentaldamage. The commenter suggested that the regulatory authority should beable to waive certain performance standards, e.g. drainage control, cutand fill slopes, and lane widths, as along as erosion and stream sedimentationare controlled. OSMRE did not include such a waiver provision in the final rule. In accordancewith 30 CFR 701.11(e), existing structures, including roads, that meetthe performance standards may be exempted from meeting the design requirements.To the extent that changes may be required by a regulatory authority tobring existing permitted roads into compliance with this rule, no significantreconstruction and expense or increased environmental harm is expected.Existing permitted roads should already be in compliance with the performancestandards of a State or Federal regulatory program.One commenter noted that andSection; 816.150(b) refers to erosion requirementsfor roads, but lacks sediment control standards. The commenter argued that,without some guidance, it would be difficult for states to be ``no lesseffective'' in parallel provisions of their regulations. OSMRE did not accept this comment. OSMRE believes that adequate performancestandards for sediment control can be found in andSection;andSection; 816/817.150(b).These standards are fully consistent with the requirements of section 515(b)(17)of the Act. OSMRE recognizes that the mechanisms for achieving that standardvary widely over the wide range of topographic, climatological and geologicconditions, and also vary according to the uses of the roads, where thesestandards will be applied. OSMRE therefore feels further guidance is notappropriate or necessary. States may or may not choose to elaborate uponthis guidance in ways specific to the conditions in those States. So longas the required results are achieved in actual implementation, such elaborationis at the States's discretion. One commenter was unsure if the performance standards in andSection; 816.150(b)were intended to relieve coal mine operators of the general requirementsto meet effluent limitations. The commenter thought that 30 CFR 816.46,which prescribes performance standards for siltation structures, excludedroads from meeting effluent limits and wondered if andSection; 816.150(b)could be interpreted the same way. Another commenter was confused aboutthe application of performance standards for drainage control systems forroads. The commenter noted that, under 30 CFR 816.46(a)(2), drainage fromroads for which the upstream area is not otherwise disturbed by the operatoris exempt from the requirement of passing through a siltation structure.The commenter, however, also noted that the disturbance associated withroads must be conducted to minimize disturbance to the hydrologic balanceas required in andSection;andSection; 816.41 and 816.45. The commenter wasconcerned as to what the specific drainage control requirements are forroads. Effluent limitations only apply to point source discharges regulated undersection 402 of the Clean Water Act. Section 816.150(b) does not requirethe creation of a point source. However, if a point source is created,a National Pollutant Discharge Elimination System permit would be requiredand effluent limits would apply. A variety of other mechanisms may alsobe and are being used to provide the required protection of water quality.Two commenters were concerned with the word ``prevent'' in andSection; 816.150(b)(1)through (3) and (6). It was suggested that it be deleted because it wasthe intent of Congress to have OSMRE set attainable standards which would``minimize'' erosion and ``prevent'' damage. The commenters felt that itwould be unrealistic to require an operator to ``prevent'' erosion, siltation,and air pollution. Another commenter favored deletion of both ``control''and ``prevent.'' OSMRE did not accept the suggestions and believes that the language inandSection; 816.150(b) is consistent with the language in the Act at section515(b)(17) which requires the operation as a minimum to insure that theconstruction, maintenance, and postmining conditions of access roads intoand across the site of operations will control or prevent erosion and siltation,pollution of water, damage to fish or wildlife or their habitat, or publicor private property (Emphasis added). It should be noted that andSection;816.150(b) allows the regulatory authority the flexibility to determinethe level of protection necessary to control or prevent erosion, siltation,or air pollution attendant to erosion.One commenter suggested that the language in andSection; 816.150(b)(1) withrespect to exposed surfaces be clarified by adding the word ``road'' betweenexposed and surfaces. OSMRE does not agree that this clarification is necessary because thosesurfaces exposed in connection with construction, use, reconstruction,maintenance, or reclamation of the road are properly subject to this requirement.Four commenters responded with respect to the control of air pollution.One commenter supported the language in andSection; 816.150(b)(1), and assertedthat OSMRE is the appropriate agency to regulate fugitive dust at coalmining operations. One commenter requested that OSMRE change the languagein andSection; 816.150(b) in its entirety. This commenter was concerned thatair and water quality standards were being intermixed. The commenter alsonoted that previous district court decisions clarified that Congress onlyintended to regulate air pollution related to erosion. One commenter statedthat the issue of responsibility in the control of air pollution attendantto erosion and pollution caused by fugitive dust as part of a surface miningoperation is currently on appeal. Another commenter was concerned thatincluding specific air pollution control measures in andSection; 816.150(b)would lead to these measures being interpreted as the exclusive means necessaryfor compliance. It was suggested that these measures be kept only in thepreamble. OSMRE believes that the language in andSection; 816.150(b)(1) is in harmonywith the intent of Congress. It is appropriate for OSMRE to regulate roaddust consistent with section 515(b)(17) of the Act because of the needto protect public and private property. It is being applied here in a mannerconsistent with section 515(b)(4). The U.S. Court of Appeals for the Districtof Columbia Circuit recently issued a decision concerning the issue ofresponsibility for control of air pollution attendant to erosion (<T3>NWF v. Hodel</T3>, 839 F.2nd 694, 765). The appeals court concludedthat the Secretary's interpretation of section 515(b)(4) of the Act, ascontrolling only the impacts of mining on air quality due to erosion, isreasonable. OSMRE also believes that the use of the terms ``erosion,''``siltation,'' and ``air pollution attendant to erosion'' in andSection;816.150(b)(1) is appropriate in considering what measures are necessaryto meet the performance standards. OSMRE does not intend this list of measuresto exclude the use of other measures for controlling dust attendant toerosion and does not intend that the language in andSection; 816.150(b)(1)be interpreted that way. The phrase ``such as'' makes that clear. The EPA noted that proposed andSection; 816.150(b)(1) stated that road shouldbe built, used and maintained to control ``air pollution attendant to erosion''and that the preamble to the proposal explained that this phrase includes``road dust, as well as dust occurring on other exposed surfaces'' (52FR 42262, November 3, 1987). EPA suggested that the explanation shouldbe included in the final rule language to clarify that the performancestandards apply not only to wind erosion, but also to dust created by vehicletraffic. OSMRE has accepted this comment and made the suggested change to clarifythe applicability of the final rule. EPA noted also that proposed andSection; 816.150(b)(1) stated that air pollutionshould be controlled ``in accordance with current, prudent engineeringpractices.'' EPA stated its belief that the final rule should specify reasonablecontrol levels and techniques suitable under various conditions and requestedthe addition of a technical guidance document that would address currentpractices and their effectiveness under varying conditions. The agencysuggested that the technical guidance could be developed in the near futureand be incorporated into the regulation by reference at a later date. After giving this recommendation serious consideration, OSMRE decided notto accept it. Differing geologic and climatic factors associated with thecoal fields throughout the nation make it impractical to develop a singleset of dust control standards and techniques with nationwide applicability.In accordance with the concept of primacy, whereby the States have theprimary responsibility for the regulation of coal mining, this final rulegives State regulatory authorities the flexibility to establish guidancethat is appropriate to regional and local conditions. On request, OSMREwill provide techincal assistance to the States concerning the developmentor application of dust control standards and techniques. The primary purposeof this rule is to make clear that regulatory authorities have both theauthority and obligation to regulate road dust while recognizing that operationshave a wide range of options available for controlling it. As to the EPA's concern about the effectiveness of the treatment methodsemployed by the operator, before a mining permit is issued, the regulatoryauthority has to approve the air pollution control plan submitted by apermit applicant under 30 CFR 780.15 or 784.26. In addition, monthly inspectionsby regulatory authority inspectors under 30 CFR 840.11 and inspectionsresulting from citizens' complaints filed anytime under 30 CFR 840.15 andPart 842 will ensure that potential on-the-ground problems are resolvedquickly and efficiently. One commenter was concerned that andSection; 816.150(b)(5) would prohibitplacement of any road anywhere it would alter flow in a streambed or drainagechannel. The commenter asserted that the terms ``streambed or drainagechannel'' could be construed so as to include even the smallest ephemeralflow. The commenter suggested a language change that would replace `'streambedor drainage channel'' with ``intermittent or perennial stream.'' OSMRE did not accept this suggested language change since it is not consistentwith section 515(b)(18) of the Act which uses the phrase ``streambed ordrainage channel.'' Further, OSMRE does not agree that andSection; 816.150(b)(5)would necessarily prohibit placement of any road where it would alter flowin streambeds or drainage channels because the language in this sectionstates that the road shall refrain from ``seriously'' altering the normalflow. OSMRE does not regard this language as a strict prohibition on theplacement of roads that would cause minor alterations in normal flow. Sections 816.150(c)/817.150(c) Design and Construction Limits and Establishmentof Design Criteria Final andSection; 816.150(c) requires that roads be designed and constructedor reconstructed to meet certain criteria in order to ensure environmentalprotection appropriate for their planned duration and use. These criteriainclude limits for grade, width, surface materials, surface drainage control,culvert placement, and culvert size, that are in accordance with current,prudent engineering practices, and any other necessary design criteriaestablished by the regulatory authority. Section 816.150(c) is identicalto the proposed rule. One commenter agreed with the deletion of the provisions addressing roadsafety that had previously been included in the 1983 rule, noting thatroad safety for users is the responsibility of the Mine Safety and HealthAdministration. One commenter raised the question of what standards for road width, drainagecontrol, culvert placement, etc. will apply in Federal program States sinceOSMRE sets forth no more detailed limits for Federal program States underandSection;816.150(c). The commenter was also concerned about inadequateregulation by States with ``no more stringent'' provisions in the absenceof standards in the Federal rules.Concerning Federal program States, where OSMRE is the regulatory authority,OSMRE will consider on a program-by program basis unique factors and regionaland local conditions present in each State and will propose and promulgateappropriate standards in accordance with 30 CFR Part 736 if it determinesthat program-wide design criteria are needed. Concerning States that havelegislatively prohibited their regulatory authorities from promulgatingregulations more stringent than the Federal regulations, OSMRE considersthat the regulations adopted today provide a reasonable expansion of thestatutory requirements and are adequate for effective regulation of surfacecoal mining operations. Further expansion and additional regulations maybe promulgated at the States' discretion. OSMRE does not believe that useof design standards by a State in its rules would necessarily be more stringentthan the Federal rules. This issue was also addressed by the Secretaryin his March 5, 1984 brief in <T3>Round II,</T3> referenced earlier.One commenter suggested that the design, construction, and certificationof ancillary roads should also be done by a qualified registered professionalto ensure proper drainage control and stability of road embarkments.OSMRE believes the suggested requirement to have ancillary roads designed,constructed, and certified by a qualified professional is not necessaryto ensure compliance with the performance standards because such roadshave much less potential for environmental harm than do primary roads becauseof differences in size, use and/or duration. Ancillary roads are generallyonly one lane for small vehicles, thereby involving far less earthmovingin their construction. Vehicles using ancillary roads are generally smallwith light loads and ground pressures. Therefore, to require certificationof plans and drawings for ancillary roads would place a burden on the operatorthat is unnecessary to provide the protection called for in section 515(b)(17)of the Act.One commenter was concerned that the use of the term ``surface materials''in andSection;816.150(c) implied a requirement for surfacing all roads. Thecommenter did not feel that a ``blanket'' surfacing requirement was appropriatebecause in many instances the natural surface of a road was sufficientto meet the appropriate performance standards. The commenter suggestedthat the words ``any necessary'' should precede the term ``surface materials''in the text of the rule.OSMRE does not agree that the addition of these words is necessary becausethe language in andSection;816.150(c) states that surface materials appropriatefor the planned use of the road need to be incorporated into the designand construction or reconstruction to ensure environmental protection.This requirement does not preclude a finding by the regulatory authoritythat the natural surface of the road meets the performance standards.Section 816.150(d)/817.150(d) LocationFinal andSection;816.150(d) sets the performance standards for the locationof all roads. These standards prohibit the placement of any part of a roadin the channel of an intermittent or perennial stream unless the regulatoryauthority specifically approves such an action in accordance with applicableandSection;andSection;816.41 through 816.43 and 816.57. Also, roads must belocated to minimize downstream sedimentation and flooding. The languagein andSection;816.150(d) is identical to the proposed rule except that referenceto the performance standards in accordance with which the regulatory authoritymay approve placement of a road in the channel of a stream (andSection;andSection;816.41through 816.43 and 816.57) have been added to the final rule for clarity.One commenter argued that the language in the proposed rule prohibits theuse of structures such as bridges or culverts. The commenter consideredthis a drastic departure from the Act and beyond the intent of section515(b)(18). The commenter provided suggested language to better reflectthe statutory requirements. The suggested language read, ``(1) No roadshall be built in a streambed or drainage channel.''OSMRE did not accept the commenter's suggestion. Section 816.150(d) isnot intended to establish a strict prohibition on the use of structuressuch as bridges and culverts. Section 816.43, Diversions, allows the regulatoryauthority to specify design criteria for the diversion of intermittentand perennial streams. Section 816.43 also requires the regulatory authorityto make a finding that the environmental resources of the stream will notbe adversely affected.One commenter noted that andSection;816.150(d)(1) does not contain a crossreference to andSection;816.57 as does andSection;816.151(d)(5). The commenterwas unclear if this was intended or was an inadvertent omission by OSMRE.In response to this comment, OSMRE has reviewed the reference to hydrologicbalance protection and stream buffer performance standards in proposedandSection;816.151(d)(5) and determined that those performance standardsshould be applied to the location of any road in the channel of an intermittentor perennial stream, as well as to the alteration or relocation of naturalstream channels by primary roads. Therefore, OSMRE has added the referenceto the performance standards (andSection;andSection;816.41 through 816.43 and816.57) to andSection;816.150(d)(1) of the final rule.Section 816.150(e)/817.150(e) MaintenanceFinal andSection;816.150(e) governs the general maintenance responsibilitiesof the operator. Under this section, a road must be maintained to meetthe performance standards and any additional design criteria establishedby the regulatory authority. Section 816.150(e) also requires that, inthe event of damage due to a catastrophic event, a road must be repairedas soon as is practicable after the damage has occurred. The language inandSection;816.150(e) is identical to the proposed rule.One commenter supported the language found in andSection;816.150(e) becauseit no longer contains the requirement from previous remanded and suspendedrules to maintain a road throughout its life. The commenter agrees thatthe Act does not impose a perpetual responsibility for roads in the postmininguse period. In contrast, one commenter was concerned with the deletionof the requirement to maintain a road throughout its life. The commenterargued that operators are liable under the Act for roads and suggestedreinstatement of the requirement to maintain roads throughout their life.OSMRE did not propose this requirement because, under the Act, an operatorhas no responsibility for maintenance of the postmining land use afterthe performance bond has been properly released for the area in which theroad is located. For this same reason, the suggestion that the requirementbe added was not accepted.Section 816.150(f)/817.150(f) ReclamationFinal andSection;816.150(f) provides that a road which is not to be retainedunder an approved postmining land use must be reclaimed as soon as practicableafter it is no longer needed for mining and reclamation operations. Thereclamation activities that are required by this paragraph include: (1)Closing the road to traffic; (2) removing all bridges and culverts unlessapproved as part of the postmining land use; (3) removing or otherwisedisposing of road-surfacing materials that are incompatible with the postminingland use and the revegetation requirements of the regulation; (4) reshapingcut and fill slopes as necessary to be compatible with the postmining landuse and to complement the natural drainage pattern of the surrounding terrain;(5) protecting the natural drainage pattern by installing dikes or crossdrains as necessary to control surface runoff and erosion; and (6) scarifyingor ripping the roadbed, replacing topsoil or substitute material, and revegetatingdisturbed surfaces in accordance with 30 CFR 816.22 and 816.111-816.116.As discussed below, the final rule differs from the proposal in that thephrase ``as soon as practicable'' has replaced the word ``immediately.''Three commenters were concerned with the word ``immediately'' in the phrase``shall be reclaimed in accordance with the approved reclamation plan immediatelyafter it is no longer needed for mining and reclamation operations.'' Thecommenters believed it to be an unreasonable requirement that is subjectto varying interpretations. The commenters noted that it may actually beenvironmentally undesirable for a road to be reclaimed during certain timesof the year, due to problems with runoff and sediment control. One of thesecommenters argued that the immediate reclamation of a road would eliminateneeded flexibility and preclude reuse of the road if mining and reclamationconditions change. One commenter noted that immediate reclamation is notneeded to enforce the intent of the regulation.OSMRE agrees with the commenters and has substituted the phrase ``as soonas practicable'' for the word ``immediately'' in andSection;816.150(f) ofthe final rule. OSMRE believes that the phrase ``as soon as practicable''is in keeping with the intentions of the Act as expressed in sections 102(e),515(b) (2) and (16), which basically require reclamation to take placeas contemporaneously as practicable with mining. However, this requirementdoes not become operable until the road is no longer needed. To postponereclamation, the permittee must show a future need for or continuing useof the road as a part of his operation. The operator is required to maintainthe road during this period. The reclamation schedule necessary to meetthe requirement for timely reclamation should be contained in the permitand be consistent with the intent of the Act, by providing for reclamationwhich is as contemporaneous as practicable, minimizing unreasonable delaysin reclamation implementation, and proceeding in an environmentally soundmanner.One commenter believed that proposed andSection;816.150(f) should allow coalexploration roads to remain if they comply with the postmining land use.In the commenter's opinion, if retained, these roads would allow for bettermanagement of the forest reserve through better access for timber managementand fire fighting activities.OSMRE agrees that the retention of roads can be beneficial and has madeprovision in 30 CFR Part 815 for the retention of coal exploration roadsin limited circumstances. Specifically, andSection;815.15(d) provides anexemption from the requirement that all facilities and equipment be promptlyremoved from the exploration area when they are no longer needed. If theregulatory authority determines that the facilities or equipment will provideadditional environmental data, reduce or control the on-site and off-siteeffects of the exploration operation, or facilitate future surface miningand reclamation operations, the facilities (roads) and equipment may beretained. The operator must apply to the regulatory authority for approvalof the retention on a case-by-case basis. To the extent that coal explorationroads meet one of these three criteria, they may be exempted from the reclamationrequirement. However, it should be noted that the concept of an approvedpostmining land use is not applicable to coal exploration activities sinceexploration is not mining. Therefore, OSMRE did not accept the suggestedchange.One commenter suggested that some language should be added to andSection;816.150(f)to clarify that both primary and ancillary roads are considered to be partof the surface coal mining operation and subject to the performance standards.OSMRE agrees that both primary and ancillary roads are part of the surfacecoal mining operation. However, OSMRE believes that the wording of andSection;816.150,<T3>Roads: General,</T3> is sufficiently clear in applying that sectionto all roads as defined in 30 CFR 701.5. Therefore, no change has beenmade.One commenter supported the phrase ``as necessary'' in the requirementin andSection;816.150(f)(4) that reclamation of a road include ``reshapingcut and fill slopes as necessary to be compatible with the postmining landuse and revegetation requirements.'' The commenter noted that this languagerecognizes that it is not always an approporiate requirement to redisturban area for reshaping where stability of a slope has been assured to thesatisfaction of the regulatory authority. In contrast, one commenter objectedto the phrase ``as necessary'' because it dilutes or loosens the requirementscontained in the remanded and suspended 1983 rule to reshape cut and fillslopes to be compatible with the postmining land use and to return theland to the approximate original contour.In developing the proposed rule OSMRE looked at how this issue was handledin the remanded and suspended 1979 rule. OSMRE stated in the preamble tothat final rule that ``obliteration of the road might in some circumstancescreate extensive environmental harm due to excessive redisturbance of theroad prism. Therefore, the concept of blending the road into the topographywas incorporated [into the final rule] based on comments received and workpractices on thousands of miles of roads by the U.S. Forest Service'' (Citationomitted.) (44 FR 14901, 15259, March 13, 1979). OSMRE went on to emphasize``that this blending is not to be construed as a variance from the requirementto restore the area to approximate original contour.'' Also, the statutorydefinition of ``approximate original contour'' allows the retention ofterrances (section 701(2) of the Act). For these reasons, OSMRE proposedlanguage similar to that used in 1979. After consideration of the comments,OSMRE feels that the position stated in 1979 and repeated here is stillvalid. Thus, OSMRE did not delete the phrase ``as necessary'' from thefinal rule.One commenter supported proposed andSection;816.150(f)(6), which allows theuse of topsoil substitutes in reclaiming roadbeds. The commenter statedthat this will accommodate the beneficial practice of redistributing topsoiltaken from road areas for use in permit areas where it will promote betterpostmining land use.OSMRE agrees that topsoil substitutes may be used in reclaiming roads andemphasizes that any such substitute material is subject to the requirementsof andSection;816.22.G. Sections 816.151/817.151 Primary RoadsFinal andSection; 816.151 establishes a set of performance standards forthe design, construction, and maintenance of primary roads, in additionto those already established for all roads in andSection; 816.150. Theseperformance standards are identical to the proposed rule except for andSection;816.151(b) and (d) which have been changed to clarify the intent of therule.Sections 816.151(a)/817.151(a) CertificationFinal andSection; 816.151(a) is identical to the proposed rule and requiresthat primary road construction or reconstruction be certified in a reportto the regulatory authority by a qualified registered professional engineeror land surveyor. The requirement for professional certification is intendedto assure that the road is properly constructed to meet the environmentalprotection standards of the Act. Certification by a qualified registeredprofessional land surveyor is allowed in any State which authorizes landsurveyors to certify the construction or reconstruction of primary roads.This provision is based on the November 4, 1983, amendment to the Act (Sec.115, Pub. L. 98-146, 97 Stat. 938 (1983)) which provides that ``not withstandingsection 507(b)(14) of the Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act of1977 (Pub. L. 95-87), cross sections, maps, or plans of land to be affectedby an application for a surface mining and reclamation permit shall beprepared by or under the direction of a qualified registered professionalengineer or geologist, or qualified registered professional land surveyorin any State which authorizes land surveyors to prepare and certify suchmaps or plans.'' A registered land surveyor must have experience in thedesign and construction of roads in order to be eligible to provide thiscertification. This authority is given only to the extent allowed underState law. This requirement is equivalent to the experience requirementfor registered engineers. Section 816.151(a) requires the certifying professionalto prepare and submit to the regulatory authority a report certifying thatthe primary road was constructed or reconstructed as designed and in accordancewith the approved plan.One commenter did not agree with the language that authorizes land surveyorsto certify the construction or reconstruction of primary roads. The commenternoted that the design and engineering of primary roads is outside the areaof expertise of land surveyors. The commenter was particularly concernedwith the adequacy of a land surveyor's expertise for roads in steep slopeareas and the frequent use of primary roads by coal hauling vehicles.OSMRE recognizes the fact that not all land surveyors have adequate expertiseto certify road construction or reconstruction and, with this in mind,uses the terms qualified and experienced in the design and constructionof roads. OSMRE feels that this language covering the experience and qualificationsof the certifying individual and the additional requirement that the Statemust authorize a land surveyor to certify primary road construction orreconstruction provides adequate justification. In view of the legislativehistory of the November 3, 1983 amendment to the Act, OSMRE has concludedthat the Congress intended the amendment to authorize certification becauseit is a step so intimately related to preparation of cross-sections, mapsand plans that authority is necessarily implied by the terms of the legislation.As discussed by Senator Byrd on the floor of the Senate (129 Cong. Rec.S12411, Sept. 19, 1983), the purpose of the amendment was to remedy ``conflictswith State laws [where the Act] preempts registered land surveyors froma lead role in the preparation and certification of maps, plans, and cross-sections.''OSMRE believes that Congress intended to authorize qualified, registered,professional land surveyors to perform both of these functions as leadprofessionals. If land surveyors were authorized merely to prepare andcertify cross sections, maps, and plans, but were not authorized to certifyassociated construction or reconstruction, their status as lead professionalswould be seriously impaired or negated. Thus, this rule authorizes qualified,registered, professional land surveyors to certify the construction orreconstruction of primary roads.One commenter noted that a registered land surveyor would have to haveexperience in the design and construction of roads in order to have a Stateauthorize the land surveyor to certify such work. The commenter indicatedthe language ``with experience in the design and construction of road''to be unnecessary. OSMRE believes that the language in andSection; 816.151(a) is necessary toensure that only these land surveyors with experience in the design andconstruction of roads be allowed to certify this work.One commenter suggested that landscape architects should also be allowedto certify the construction and reconstruction of roads. The commenternoted that the education and experience of landscape architects coupledwith their registration would qualify them to develop plans and managethe construction of all types of roads associated with coal mining.OSMRE does not have the statutory authority to allow landscape architectsto certify cross sections, maps and plans or to authorize them to certifythat the construction or reconstruction of primary roads was in accordancewith those plans.Four commenters recommended that the requirement in andSection; 816.151(a)to have the certified report sent to the regulatory authority should bechanged to allow the report to be filed at the mine site or in a reportto the regulatory authority. The commenters noted that the report shouldbe available to the inspectors at the mine site and, by filing the reportat the mine site, it would reduce the amount of paperwork that the regulatoryauthority would have to handle.OSMRE believes that it is necessary to have the certified report sent tothe regulatory authority so that any problems can be brought to the State'sattention and so that the State has the opportunity to adequately monitorcorrective action that may be necessary. Having the information on filein the State office also provides advance information to inspectors beforebeginning an inspection trip. Although OSMRE is sensitive to the concernthat regulatory authorities' paperwork burdens should be reduced wherepossible, OSMRE does not agree that the limited time involved in handlingthis certified report outweighs the need to have it available at the regulatoryauthority's office.Sections 816.151(b)/817.151(b) Safety FactorFinal andSection; 816.151(b) requires that all embankments have a minimumstatic safety factor of 1.3 or meet the requirements of andSection; 780.37(c).This section applies only to primary roads. Rather than specifying particulardesign criteria for road embankments, the 1.3 factor of safety establishesa performance standard that must be attained. The operator has the flexibilityto select the particular design for the road that meets this standard.Related andSection; 780.37(c) enables the regulatory authority to establishengineering design standards through the State program approval processin lieu of engineering tests that would be performed to establish compliancewith the safety factor. The language in final andSection; 816.151(b) hasbeen changed from the proposed language by adding a cross-reference toandSection; 780.37(c) for clarity.One commenter did not agree that a safety factor for road embankments wasnecessary, except for large embankments and those embankments which couldendanger life or property upon failure. The commenter suggested new languagefor andSection; 816.151(b) that would remove the minimum safety factor requirementand require that primary road embankments be designed in accordance withstandard engineering practice so as to be stable.Two commenters agreed that the safety factor should only be applicableto primary roads. The commenters noted that, in general, ancillary roadsare much smaller and less frequently used than primary roads. They alsonoted that, if an ancillary road would experience a slope or fill stabilityproblem, the extent of these failures and the significance of the associatedenvironmental impacts would be minimal.One commenter argued that it is necessary to apply the minimum safety factorto ancillary as well as primary roads. The commenter argued further thatthe differentiation between primary and ancillary roads was not based onthe potential for environmental effects to the point of being consistentwith the concept in the 1979 rule, that minimum safety factors should applyonly to roads that have greater environmental effects. The commenter specificallynoted that the existence of high embankments, a factor specifically discussedby OSMRE as related to the degree of environmental risk from roads, isnot a factor which is considered in the proposed distinction between primaryand ancillary roads. As a result, the commenter concluded, ancillary roadswith high embankments in steep slope areas, the failure of which couldhave serious environmental effects, would not be subject to static safetyrequirements.As discussed previously in the preamble to the road classification system,there are substantial differences between primary and ancillary roads concerningroad width (and thus the amount of cut and fill involved in steep slopes),ground pressure from traffic, and vehicle frequency that justify the applicationof the static safety factor to ensure stable primary roads that will meetthe mandate of section 515(b)(17) of the Act. This reduces the potentialfor slips or failures on those heavily used roads. On the other hand, thenarrow, lightly travelled ancillary roads do not typically have the highembankments associated with primary roads, even in steep slope areas, norare they subject to the frequent impact of high ground pressures. Therefore,OSMRE is finalizing the rule as proposed. A commenter expressed confusion about the fact that proposed andSection;andSection;780.37(c) and 784.24(c) appeared to allow the regulatory authority to developdesign standards in lieu of the minimum safety factor. The commenter arguedthat the language in the proposal was confusing and should be clarifiedconcerning the regulatory authority's flexibility to develop design standardsunder andSection; 780.37(c) in lieu of minimum safety factor requirements.Three additional commenters suggested language changes to andSection; 816.151(b)to help clarify the fact that regulatory authorities can establish engineeringdesign standards in lieu of the minimum safety factor requirement.Section 780.37(c) allows the regulatory authority to establish engineeringdesign standards for primary roads in lieu of the engineering tests thatotherwise would be performed to establish compliance with the minimum staticsafety factor of 1.3 for all primary road embankments. This provision enablesthe regulatory authority and the operator to save time and effort duringthe design and review of road plans and also ensures protection of theenvironment through the application of standards that have proved effectivefor the conditions prevalent in that State. Section 780.37(c) was not cross-referencedin proposed andSection; 816.151(b), and OSMRE recognizes, in response tothe comments, that the connection needs emphasis. Final andSection; 816.151(b)includes a cross-reference to andSection; 780.37(c) to clarify that embankmentsmust either have a minimum safety factor of 1.3 or, alternatively, meetthe design standards developed in accordance with andSection; 780.37(c).Sections 816.151(c)/817.151(c) LocationFinal andSection; 816.151(c) requires primary roads to be located, insofaras is practicable, on the most stable available surfaces to minimize erosion.Section 816.151(c)(2) prohibits primary roads from using stream fords onperennial or intermittent streams unless specifically approved by the regulatoryauthority as temporary routes during road construction. These provisionsare identical to the proposed rule. One commenter was concerned about the difference in the language of proposedandSection; 816.151(c) and that of the 1979 regulations (44 FR 15416, March13, 1979). The commenter noted that the language in 816.151(c) states thatprimary roads are located, insofar as is ``practicable,'' on the most stableavailable surface, while the 1979 regulations require roads to be placedon the most stable surface insofar as ``possible.'' The commenter proposedthat, in the alternative, roads be required to be located on ridges. OSMRE disagrees. In developing the proposed rule, OSMRE chose to use theword ``practicable'' because it provides an adequate standard for roadlocation to achieve the required stability when applied along with therequirement for a 1.3 static safety factor. OSMRE is concerned that requiringlocation of primary roads, insofar as is ``possible,'' on the most stablesurface available could result in roads being unnecessarily lengthened.In the preambles to both the 1979 (44 FR 14901, 15248, March 13, 1979)and 1983 (48 FR 22110, 22120, May 16, 1983) suspended rules, OSMRE expressedconcern that road location requirements might unduly lengthen roads aswell. Concerning the commenter's alternative, OSMRE agrees that ridgesare often the most stable surface available and should be used for roadswhere practicable. However, ridges are not always located where the roadis intended to go. Additionally, in appropriate circumstances, wildlifedisturbance can be reduced by locating roads below ridgelines (Ambrose,<T3>et al.</T3>, p. 14). Since this alternative would not allow sufficientflexibility in the location of roads, OSMRE did not accept it. Sections 816.151(d)/817.151(d) Drainage Control Final andSection; 816.151(d) requires that surface water drainage for eachprimary road be controlled in accordance with the approved reclamationand operations plan specified in andSection; 780.37(a). Final section (d)(1) requires that primary roads be constructed or reconstructed,and maintained to have adequate drainage control by using structures suchas, but not limited to, bridges, ditches, cross drains and ditch reliefdrains. Section (d)(1) also requires that, at a minimum, drainage controlsystems be designed to safely pass the peak runoff from a ten-year, six-hourprecipitation event, or greater event as specified by the regulatory authority.The language in final andSection; 816.151(d)(1) has been changed from theproposed language in an effort to clarify its intent because proposed andSection;816.151(d)(1) could be read to mean that the regulatory authority may specifya lesser precipitation event than the ten-year, six-hour event. To clarifythat the ten-year, six-hour event is the minimum precipation event thatthe drainage control system must be able to handle, the final rule allowsonly modification to a higher standard by the regulatory authority. Final andSection; 816.151(d)(2) requires that drainage pipes and culvertsbe installed as designed, and maintained in a free and operating conditionand to prevent or control erosion at inlets and outlets. Final andSection;816.151(d)(3) requires that drainage ditches be constructed and maintainedto prevent uncontrolled drainage over the road surface and embankment.Final andSection; 816.151(d)(4) requires that culverts be installed and maintainedto sustain the vertical soil pressure, the passive resistance of the foundation,and the weight of vehicles using the road. Final andSection; 816.(d)(5) requiresthat natural stream channels not be altered or relocated without priorapproval of the regulatory authority in accordance with andSection;andSection;816.41 through 816.43 and 816.57. Final andSection; 816.151(d)(6) requires that, except as provided in section(c)(2), stream channel crossings for perennial and intermittent streamsbe accomplished using bridges, culverts, low-water crossings, or otherstructures designed, constructed, and maintained using current, prudentengineering practices. The requirement for drainage structures at perennialand intermittent streams is included to ensure consistency with andSection;816.150(d)(1) of this part. By using current, prudent engineering practicesto design, construct, and maintain crossings, the hydrologic and environmentalbalance of the stream is protected while the crossing is in place. Section816.151(d)(6) includes language referring to perennial and intermittentstreams for consistency with the language of performance standard in andSection;816.150(d). Several commenters requested a clarification as to the intent of proposedandSection; 816.151(d)(1) which stated, ``The drainage control system shallbe designed to safely pass the peak runoff from a ten-year, six-hour orgreater precipitation event, unless otherwise specified by the regulatoryauthority.'' The confusion involved whether the regulatory authority couldspecify only a precipitation event greater than the ten-year, six-hourstorm, or any greater or lesser precipitation event. One commenter suggestedthat the words ``or greater precipitation'' be deleted so the regulatoryauthority could, based on site-specific conditions, reduce the design stormbelow the ten-year, six-hour event.Final andSection; 816.151(d)(1) provides flexibility to regulatory authoritiesto account for particular situations likely to be encountered over thelife of the mine or related to specific downstream conditions. The ruleallows for modification by the regulatory authority in those situationswhen the ten-year, six-hour precipitation event is not appropriate. Inorder to eliminate the confusion created by the language in proposed andSection;816.151(d)(1), OSMRE has changed the final rule to read, ``(1) Each primaryroad shall be constructed or reconstructed and maintained to have adequatedrainage control, using structures such as, but not limited to, bridges,ditches, cross drains, and ditch relief drains. The drainage control systemshall be designed to safely pass the peak runoff from a ten-year, six-hourprecipitation event, or a greater event as specified by the regulatoryauthority.'' This will ensure that reductions in the required storm eventare not made.Several commenters suggested that the design precipitation event for thedrainage control system should be modified from the ten-year, six-hourevent in the proposed rule. One commenter suggested the use of the 25-year,24-hour storm event, the ten-year, six-hour event or another event specifiedby the regulatory authority. The commenter maintained that the 25-year,24-hour event is consistent with current local practices and has not causedany problems. Another commenter stated that the ten-year, six-hour eventis excessive, and the one-year, 24-hour event should be used to designthe drainage control system. The commenter argued that no problems havebeen experienced with excessive water overtopping the road surface duringmajor storm events when the one-year, 24-hour standard was used. Two othercommenters were satisfied that the ten-year, six-hour storm would be appropriate.Another commenter contended that the drainage control systems should bedesigned for a ten-year, 24-hour storm event rather than a ten-year, six-hourevent because better data is available for the 24-hour events. Also, thecommenter indicated that the peak flows for ten-year, 24-hour events andten-year, six-hour events do not differ significantly. One commenter believedthat the ten-year, six-hour event standard could create compliance problemssince some states currently design for a 25-year, 24-hour event. If theten-year, six-hour event produces higher peak runoff volumes than the 25-year,24-hour event, the commenter maintained that existing approved roads couldbe found in non-compliance. (See the discussion under <T3>General Comments </T3>concerning existing structures.)OSMRE believes that the ten-year, six-hour precipitation event is appropriatefor drainage control systems for primary roads. This design event makesthe road rules consistent with the rules for diversions in andSection; 816.43.OSMRE recognizes that for some basins, depending on location, the 24-hourduration storm may result in a runoff volume somewhat higher than the six-hourstorm for the same area (44 FR 15207, March 13, 1979). However, for mostmining situations, a six-hour event is more likely to result in a higherpeak flow. See the Final Environmental Statement, OSM-EIS-1: Supplement,Volume 1: Analysis, p. IV-17. For a given storm frequency, the time ofconcentration and watershed shape can be more influential in determiningthe peak flow than the storm duration. Therefore, in most cases the differencesin any increased volume of peak flow will be minor from a practical designand construction standpoint. Any computed increase in peak flow volumewould most likely not result in any significant change in flow depth orflow velocity and, correspondingly, any alteration in the design of thedrainage control system. Thus, OSMRE did not find any compelling reasonsto change the proposed design event standard in response to comments onthe proposed rule.One commenter asserted that drainage control systems designed to pass thepeak runoff from a ten-year, six-hour or greater precipitation event asrequired in proposed andSection; 816.151(d)(1), would be inadequate. Thecommenter argued that drainage control systems for ancillary roads, especiallythose with high embankments and those in steep slope areas, should be requiredto be designed to safely pass the peak runoff from some precipitation eventthat is greater than the ten-year, six-hour storm. The commenter was alsoparticularly concerned with long-term or permanent roads where there ispotential danger to health and/or safety or significant environmental impacts.The commenter suggested that drainage control systems for long-term roadshave a minimum of a 25-year precipitation event, and permanent roads havea minimum of a 100-year precipitation event. The commenter also suggestedthat drainage control systems on roads with high potential for injury orsignificant environmental damage should be designed to appropriate precipitationevent standards. Another commenter suggested that there should be a distinction made inthe design precipitation events for temporary water crossings versus permanentstructures. The commenter argued that permanent structures have a longerintended life and should be designed accordingly. The commenter suggestedthat the design precipitation event for permanent structures should bethe 100-year, six-hour event, with the exception for low-water crossingssince they are designed to be overtopped. OSMRE believes that a minimum standard of a ten-year, six-hour precipitationevent for the design of drainage control system is adequate to protectthe public and the environment from significant damage. The U.S. Army Corpsof Engineers and State highway departments use ten-year storms for designpurposes. The regulatory authority may specify a greater precipitationevent as appropriate for site-specific conditions and situations. Concerningancillary roads, OSMRE considers that the standards in final andSection;816.150(b) (2) through (6) are adequate to protect the environment withoutdetails associated with the standards for primary roads. The standardsin andSection; 816.150(b) allow the operator and the regulatory authorityto use a variety of methods to minimize adverse environmental impacts fromancillary roads. One commenter suggested that proposed andSection; 816.151(d)(1) be revisedto delete the word ``reconstructed.'' The commenter argued that roads inexistence at the time that this rulemaking is adopted should not be requiredto be reconstructed. OSMRE does not agree. The word ``reconstructed'' in the context of thisrule refers to those situations where an operator on his own initiativedecides to upgrade or improve significantly a road by reconstructing it.The application of these standards to existing roads is covered by theprovisions of 30 CFR 701.11(e), concerning existing structures. One commenter suggested that the word ``avoid'' in proposed andSection; 816.151(d)(2)be replaced by the word ``control.'' The commenter noted that, becausesome erosion is unavoidable, the use of the word ``avoid'' makes it possiblefor an operator to meet this requirement. Since the language of section 515(b)(17) of the Act requires control orprevention of erosion, not avoidance of erosion, OSMRE has deleted theword ``avoid'' and replaced it with ``prevent or control'' in the finalrule. One commenter noted that the performance standards for diversions are foundin 30 CFR 816.43, but the definition of ``diversion'' in 30 CFR 701.5 doesnot explicitly include stream channel crossings. The commenter suggestedrevising the definition of ``diversion'' to clarify that stream channelcrossings (i.e., culverts, bridges, fords, etc.) are included in the definitionand that the requirements of andSection; 816.43 apply to roads. The commenteralso suggested that specific reclamation design criteria for restorationof channel crossings be added. The definition of ``diversion'' does not include stream channel crossings,and OSMRE does not agree that the definition should be changed. Culverts,bridges, and fords are man-made structures that cross a stream and do not``divert'' water to a channel in a new location. OSMRE does not agree thatspecific design criteria for restoration of stream channel crossings shouldbe included in the final rule. The performance standards adopted todayand other permanent program regulations, e.g. 30 CFR 816.43, are adequateto minimize environmental harm. Further, specific design criteria wouldlimit the regulatory authority's flexibility in approving effective reclamationdesigns. One commenter felt that the addition of low-water crossings to the listof structures that are allowed for stream crossings was not acceptablebecause of potential problems with erosion and increased sediment, andthe fact that they are inundated by high flows. The commenter noted furtherthat there is a need for detailed national standards for erosion preventionand sediment control. OSMRE notes that the regulations require that the operator prevent erosionand sediment problems with low-water crossings. Final andSection; 816.151(d)(6)specifically states that ``the regulatory authority shall ensure that low-watercrossings are designed, constructed, and maintained to prevent erosionof the structure or streambed and additional contributions of suspendedsolids to streamflow.'' OSMRE agrees that by design, low-water crossingswill be inundated during high flows which will restrict their use. OSMREdoes not agree that this creates a problem except that it necessarily willcause the operator to alter mining operations to accommodate the inundation.One commenter was concerned with the use of the word ``prevent'' in proposedandSection; 816.151(d)(6) with respect to erosion associated with low-waterstructures. The commenter suggested that the word ``prevent'' be replacedby the word ``control'' because an operator cannot prevent erosion entirely.OSMRE kept the word ``prevent'' in final andSection; 816.151(d)(6) becauseby design, a low-water structure will be inundated during high-water flowperiods, and this high-water flow will have greater velocities and erosionpotential than during periods of low water. Therefore, the design, construction,and maintenance of low-water structures must prevent erosion of the structureand streambed during all anticipated flow conditions. One commenter inquired if it was the intent of OSMRE to allow retentionof low-water crossings as permanent structures. OSMRE believes that the decision on retention of low-water crossings aspermanent structures is the responsibility of the regulatory authority.This decision must consider the requirements of 30 CFR 816.133 and otherassociated permanent structure performance requirements. Sections 816.151(e)/817.151(e) Surfacing Final andSection; 816.151(e) is identical to the proposed rule and requiresthat primary roads be surfaced with material approved by the regulatoryauthority as being sufficiently durable for the anticipated volume of traficand the weight and speed of vehicles using the road. The final rule doesnot specify the kinds of materials which must be used for surfacing primaryroads and does not list routine maintenance responsibilities for primaryroads. Since the regulatory authority may approve only surfacing materialsthat meet the requirements of this section, it is not necessary to listthe materials that may be used. The regulatory authority should have theflexibility to approve any material which will satisfy these requirements.The final rule establishes adequate maintenance requirements for all roadsand, therefore, it is not necessary to establish separate requirementsfor primary roads. The regulatory authority may specify additional maintenancecriteria for primary roads, as necessary. One commenter was concerned that the requirements in proposed andSection;816.151(e) were too general. The commenter questioned if economics wouldbe taken into account when the regulatory authority comes to a decisionon the type of material that will be ``sufficiently durable.'' The commenterraised the possibility that appropriate surface materials may not be availableat or near the mine site, and the costs to obtain the required materialscould be prohibitive. Two commenters argued that proposed andSection; 816.151(e)was a ``blanket'' surfacing requirement that would, in every case, requiresome type of additional surface material. The commenters contended that,in many instances, the natural surface of the road may be sufficient tomeet the performance standards. The commenters suggested that the languagein andSection; 816.151(e) be changed by taking out the phrase ``approvedby the regulatory authority.'' OSMRE does not foresee that a regulatory authority would take economicsinto account in approving road surfacing material. In the first place,the regulatory experience OSMRE has accumulated over the past ten yearsindicates that durable surfacing material is usually present in sufficientquantities at the vast majority of coal mining operations, particularlywhen used in association with periodic chemical treatment to maintain acompacted, dust-free surface. Secondly, the purpose of the provision isto protect the environment, that is, to ensure that the road surfacingmaterial is sufficiently durable to avoid problems with excessive dustand erosion due to breakdown of the road surface. While OSMRE agrees that,in some instances, the natural surface of the road may be sufficient tomeet the performance standards, the commenter's suggested change was notaccepted. Final andSection; 816.151(e) does not preclude the acceptabilityof the natural road surface in meeting the durability requirement. One commenter objected to the lack of a justification for the requirementto have the surface materials approved in advance. OSMRE believes that the regulatory authority must review the type of surfacematerial proposed for the construction of each primary road prior to theconstruction of the road. From a practical standpoint, prior approval willensure that environmental damage does not result from surfacing with substandardmaterial, and will avoid the problems and costs associated with havingto remove any substandard material and/or resurface the road. H. References In addition to the literature cited with previous rulemakings on this subject(43 FR 41739, September 18, 1978; 44 FR 15245, March 13, 1979; and 47 FR16595, April 16, 1982) which was used as general background material, thefollowing items were used in the preparation of this final rule: <ITAG tagnum="21">Ambrose, R.E., C.R. Hinkle, and C.R. Wenzel, 1983, Practices for protectingand enhancing fish and wildlife on coal surface-mined lands in the SouthcentralU.S., U.S. Department of the Interior, Fish and Wildlife Service, FWS/OBS-83/11,229 pp. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">Kaufman, W.K. and J.C. Ault, 1977, Design of Surface Mine HaulageRoads_A Manual, U.S. Department of the Interior, Bureau of Mines, InformationCircular No. 8758, 68 pp. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="21">U.S. Department of the Interior, Office of Surface Mining Reclamationand Enforcement, 1983, Proposed revisions to the Permanent Program RegulationsImplementing section 501(b) of the Surface Mining Control and ReclamationAct of 1977, Final Environmental Statement, OSM-EIS-1: Supplement, 3 vols.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="84">III. Procedural Matters </ITAG>Effect in Federal Program States and on Indian Lands The rule applies through cross-referencing, to those states with Federalprogams. This includes California (as of August 12, 1988; 53 FR 26570,July 13, 1988), Georgia, Idaho, Massachusetts, Michigan, North Carolina,Oregon, Rhode Island, South Dakota, Tennessee, and Washington. The Federalprograms for these States appear at 30 CFR Parts 905, 910, 912, 921, 922,933, 937, 939, 941, 942, and 947, respectively. The rule also applies,through cross-referencing, to Indian lands under the Federal program forIndian lands as provided in 30 CFR Part 750. Effect on State Programs Following promulgation of the final rule, OSMRE will evaluate permanentState regulatory programs approved under section 503 of SMCRA to determinewhether any changes in these programs will be necessary. If the Directordetermines that certain State program provisions should be amended in orderto be made no less effective than the revised Federal rules, the individualstates will be notified in accordance with the provisions of 30 CFR 732.17. Executive Order 12291 The Department of the Interior has examined this final rule according tothe criteria of Executive Order 12291 (February 17, 1981) and has determinedthat this is not a major rule and does not require a regulatory impactanalysis. The final rule will impose only minor costs on the coal industryand coal consumers because it emphasizes the use of performance standardsinstead of design criteria which will allow operators to use the most cost-effectivemeans of achieving the minimum standards. Regulatory Flexibility Act The Department of the Interior has also determined, pursuant to the RegulatoryFlexibility Act, 5 U.S.C. 601 <T3>et seq.,</T3> that this final rule will not have a significant economicimpact on a substantial number of small entities. The funds that a smalloperator will have to invest in the construction of roads to comply withthis final rule will only be minimally increased over what would normallybe spent to ensure efficient transportation and minimal vehicle damage.The cost of building roads will be defrayed by lowered maintenance costsfor roads and vehicles. The operator will also avoid losses from a shutdownof operations due to impassable roads. Federal Paperwork Reduction Act The information collection requirements contained in andSection;andSection;780.37 and 780.38 have been approved by the Office of Management and Budget(OMB) under 44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq.</T3> and assigned clearance number 1029-0036. The informationcollection requirements contained in andSection;andSection; 784.24 and 784.30have been approved by OMB under 44 U.S.C. 3501 <T3>et seq.</T3> and assigned clearance number 1029-0039. Public reporting burden for this information is estimated to average asfollows: andSection; 780.37_17.0 hours, andSection; 780.38_12.0 hours, andSection;784.24_9.7 hours, and andSection; 784.30_12.0 hours, per response, includingthe timre for reviewing instructions, searching existing data sources,gathering and maintaining the data needed, and completing and reviewingthe collection of information. Send comments regarding this burden estimateor any other aspect of this collection information, including suggestionsfor reducing the burden, to Information Collection Clearance Officer, OSMRE,1951 Constitution Avenue, NW., Washington, DC 20240; and the Office ofInformation and Regulatory Affairs, OMB, Washington, DC 20503. National Environmental Policy Act OSMRE has prepared an environmental assessment and has made a finding thatthe final rules will not significantly affect the quality of the humanenvironment under section 102(2)(C) of the National Environmental PolicyAct of 1969, 42 U.S.C. 4332(2)(C). The environmental assessment is on filein the OSMRE Administrative Record, Room 5131, 1100 L Street, NW., Washington,DC. Agency Approval Section 516(a) requires that, with regard to rules directed toward thesurface effects of underground mining, OSMRE must obtain written concurrencefrom the head of the department which administers the Federal Mine Safetyand Health Act of 1977, the successor to the Federal Coal Mine Health andSafety Act of 1969. OSMRE has obtained the written concurrence of the AssistantSecretary for Mine Safety and Health, U.S. Department of Labor. Authors The authors of this rule are Robert A. Wiles, P.E., and Donald E. Stump,Jr., P.E., with assistance from Patrick W. Boyd; OSMRE, 1951 ConstitutionAvenue, NW., Washington, DC 20240; Telephone: 202-343-1502 (Commercialor FTS). <ITAG tagnum="84">List of Subjects </ITAG>30 CFR Part 701 Law enforcement, Surface mining, Underground mining. 30 CFR Part 780 Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Surface mining. 30 CFR Part 784 Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Underground mining. 30 CFR Part 815 Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Surface mining. 30 CFR Part 816Environmental protection, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements, Surfacemining.30 CFR Part 817 Coal mining, Environmental protection, Reporting and recordkeeping requirements,Underground mining. Accordingly, 30 CFR Parts 701, 780, 784, 815, 816, and 817 are amendedas set forth below:<ITAG tagnum="21">Dated: September 14, 1988. </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="6">J. Steven Griles, </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="4">Assistant Secretary_Land and Minerals Management.  </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="52">PART 701_PERMANENT REGULATORY PROGRAM</ITAG>1. The authority citation for Part 701 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Pub. L. 95-87, 30 U.S.C. 1201 <T3>et seq</T3>., as amended, and Pub. L. 100-34.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 701.5 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">[Amended]</ITAG>2. In andSection; 701.5, the definition of <T3>road</T3> is reinstated and revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><T3>Road</T3> means a surface right-of-way for purposes of travel by landvehicles used in surface coal mining and reclamation operations or coalexploration. A road consists of the entire area within the right-of-way,including the roadbed, shoulders, parking and side areas, approaches, structures,ditches, and surface. The term includes access and haulroads constructed,used, reconstructed, improved, or maintained for use in surface coal miningand reclamation operations or coal exploration, including use by coal haulingvehicles to and from transfer, processing, or storage areas. The term doesnot include ramps and routes of travel within the immediate mining areaor within spoil or coal mine waste disposal areas.<ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="56">PART 780_SURFACE MINING PERMIT APPLICATIONS_MINIMUM REQUIREMENTS FORRECLAMATION AND OPERATIONS PLAN</ITAG>3. The authority citation for Part 780 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Pub. L. 95-87, 30 U.S.C. 1201 <T3>et seq., </T3>as amended; sec. 115 of Pub. L. 98-146, 30 U.S.C. 1257;16 U.S.C. 470 <T3>et seq.;</T3> and Pub. L. 100-34.</ITAG>4. Section 780.37 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 780.37 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Road systems.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Plans and drawings. </T3>Each applicant for a surface coal mining andreclamation permit shall submit plans and drawings for each road, as definedin andSection; 701.5 of this chapter, to be constructed, used, or maintainedwithin the proposed permit area. The plans and drawings shall_(1) Include a map, appropriate cross sections, design drawings and specificationsfor road widths, gradients, surfacing materials, cuts, fill embankments,culverts, bridges, drainage ditches, low-water crossings, and drainagestructures;(2) Contain the drawings and specifications of each proposed road thatis located in the channel of an intermittent or perennial stream, as necessaryfor approval of the road by the regulatory authority in accordance withandSection; 816.150(d)(1) of this chapter;(3) Contain the drawings and specifications for each proposed ford of perennialor intermittent streams that is used as a temporary route, as necessaryfor approval of the ford by the regulatory authority in accordance withandSection; 816.151(c)(2) of this chapter;(4) Contain a description of measures to be taken to obtain approval ofthe regulatory authority for alteration or relocation of a natural streamchannel under andSection; 816.151(d)(5) of this chapter;(5) Contain the drawings and specifications for each low-water crossingof perennial or intermittent stream channels so that the regulatory authoritycan maximize the protection of the stream in accordance with andSection;816.151(d)(6) of this chapter; and(6) Describe the plans to remove and reclaim each road that would not beretained under an approved postmining land use, and the schedule for thisremoval and reclamation.(b) <T3>Primary road certification.</T3> The plans and drawings for each primaryroad shall be prepared by, or under the direction of, and certified bya qualified registered professional engineer, or in any State which authorizesland surveyors to certify the design of primary roads a qualified registeredprofessional land surveyor, with experience in the design and constructionof roads, as meeting the requirements of this chapter; current, prudentengineering practices; and any design criteria established by the regulatoryauthority.(c) <T3>Standard design plans. </T3>The regulatory authority may establishengineering design standards for primary roads through the State programapproval process, in lieu of engineering tests, to establish compliancewith the minimum static safety factor of 1.3 for all embankments specifiedin andSection; 816.151(b) of this chapter.5. Section 780.38 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 780.38 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Support facilities.</ITAG>Each applicant for a surface coal mining and reclamation permit shall submita description, plans, and drawings for each support facility to be constructed,used, or maintained within the proposed permit area. The plans and drawingsshall include a map, appropriate cross sections, design drawings, and specificationssufficient to demonstrate compliance with andSection; 816.181 of this chapterfor each facility.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 784_UNDERGROUND MINING PERMIT APPLICATIONS_MINIMUM REQUIREMENTSFOR RECLAMATION AND OPERATIONS PLAN</ITAG>6. The authority citation for Part 784 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority:</T4> Pub. L. 95-87, 30 U.S.C. 1201 <T3>et seq., </T3>as amended; sec. 115 of Pub. L. 98-146, 30 U.S.C. 1257;16 U.S.C. 470 <T3>et seq.; </T3>and Pub. L. 100-34.</ITAG>7. Section 784.24 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 784.24 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Road systems.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Plans and drawings. </T3>Each applicant for an underground coal miningand reclamation permit shall submit plans and drawings for each road, asdefined in andSection; 701.5 of this chapter, to be constructed, used, ormaintained within the proposed permit area. The plans and drawings shall_(1) Include a map, appropriate cross sections, design drawings, and specificationsfor road widths, gradients, surfacing materials, cuts, fill embankments,culverts, bridges, drainage ditches, low-water crossings, and drainagestructures;(2) Contain the drawings and specifications of each proposed road thatis located in the channel of an intermittent or perennial stream, as necessaryfor approval of the road by the regulatory authority in accordance withandSection; 817.150(d)(1) of this chapter;(3) Contain the drawings and specifications for each proposed ford of perennialor intermittent streams that is used as a temporary route, as necessaryfor approval of the ford by the regulatory authority in accordance withandSection; 817.151(c)(2) of this chapter;(4) Contain a description of measures to be taken to obtain approval ofthe regulatory authority for alteration or relocation of a natural streamchannel under andSection; 817.151(d)(5) of this chapter;(5) Contain the drawings and specifications for each low-water crossingof perennial or intermittent stream channels so that the regualtory authoritycan maximize the protection of the stream in accordance with andSection;817.151(d)(6) of this chapter; and(6) Describe the plans to remove and reclaim each road that would not beretained under an approved postmining land use, and the schedule for thisremoval and reclamation.(b) <T3>Primary road certification. </T3>The plans and drawings for each primaryroad shall be prepared by, or under the direction of, and certified bya qualified registered professional engineer, or in any State which authorizesland surveyors to certify the design of primary roads a qualified registeredprofessional land surveyor, experienced in the design and constructionof roads, as meeting the requirements of this chapter; current, prudentengineering practices; and any design criteria established by the regulatoryauthority.(c) <T3>Standard design plans. </T3>The regulatory authority may establishengineering design standards for primary roads through the State programapproval process, in lieu of engineering tests, to establish compliancewith the minimum static safety factor of 1.3 for all embankments specifiedin andSection; 817.151(b) of this chapter.8. Section 784.30 is added to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 784.30 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Support facilities.</ITAG>Each applicant for an underground coal mining and reclamation permit shallsubmit a description, plans, and drawings for each support facility tobe constructed, used, or maintained within the proposed permit area. Theplans and drawings shall include a map, appropriate cross sections, designdrawings, and specifications sufficient to demonstrate compliance withandSection; 817.181 of this chapter for each facility.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 815_PERMANENT PROGRAM STANDARDS_COAL EXPLORATION</ITAG>9. The authority citation for Part 815 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Pub. L. 95-87, U.S.C. 1201 <T3>et se., </T3>as amended; and Pub. L. 100-34.</ITAG>10. Section 815.15 is amended by revising paragraph (b) to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 815.15 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Performance standards for coal exploration.</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="37">* * * * *</ITAG>(b) All roads or other transportation facilities used for coal explorationshall comply with the applicable provisions of andSection;andSection; 816.150(b) through (f), 816.180, and 816.181 of this chapter.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 816_PERMANENT PROGRAM PERFORMANCE STANDARDS_SURFACE MINING ACTIVITIES</ITAG>11. The authority citation for Part 816 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Pub. L. 95-87, 30 U.S.C. 1201 <T3>et seq., </T3>as amended; sec. 115 of Pub. L. 98-146, 30 U.S.C. 1257;and Pub. L. 100-34.</ITAG>12. Section 816.150 is reinstated and revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 816.150 </ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Roads: general.</ITAG>(a) <T3>Road classification system. </T3>(1) Each road, as defined in andSection;701.5 of this chapter, shall be classified as either a primary road oran ancillary road.(2) A primary road is any road which is-(i) Used for transporting coal or spoil;(ii) Frequently used for access or other purposes for a period in excessof six months; or(iii) To be retained for an approved postmining land use.(3) An ancillary road is any road not classified as a primary road.(b) <T3>Performance standards. </T3>Each road shall be located, designed, constructed,reconstructed, used, maintained, and reclaimed so as to:(1) Control or prevent erosion, siltation, and the air pollution attendantto erosion, including road dust as well as dust occurring on other exposedsurfaces, by measures such as vegetating, watering, using chemical or otherdust suppressants, or otherwise stabilizing all exposed surfaces in accordancewith current, prudent engineering practices; (2) Control or prevent damage to fish, wildlife, or their habitat and relatedenvironmental values; (3) Control or prevent additional contributions of suspended solids tostream flow or runoff outside the permit area; (4) Neither cause nor contribute to, directly or indirectly, the violationof State or Federal water quality standards applicable to receiving waters;(5) Refrain from seriously altering the normal flow of water in streambedsor drainage channels; (6) Prevent or control damage to public or private property, includingthe prevention or mitigation of adverse effects on lands within the boundariesof units of the National Park System, the National Wildlife Refuge System,the National System of Trails, the National Wilderness Preservation System,the Wild and Scenic Rivers System, including designated study rivers, andNational Recreation Areas designated by Act of Congress; (7) Use nonacid- and nontoxic-forming substances in road surfacing. (c)<T3> Design and construction limits and establishment of design criteria</T3>.To ensure environmental protection appropriate for their planned durationand use, including consideration of the type and size of equipment used,the design and construction or reconstruction of roads shall incorporateappropriate limits for grade, width, surface materials, surface drainagecontrol, culvert placement, and culvert size, in accordance with current,prudent engineering practices, and any necessary design criteria establishedby the regulatory authority. (d)<T3> Location</T3>. (1) No part of any road shall be located in the channelof an intermittent or perennial stream unless specifically approved bythe regulatory authority in accordance with applicable andSection;andSection;816.41 through 816.43 and 816.57 of this chapter. (2) Roads shall be located to minimize downstream sedimentation and flooding.(e)<T3> Maintenance</T3>. (1) A road shall be maintained to meet the performancestandards of this part and any additional criteria specified by the regulatoryauthority. (2) A road damaged by a catastrophic event, such as a flood or earthquake,shall be repaired as soon as is practicable after the damage has occurred.(f)<T3> Reclamation</T3>. A road not to be retained under an approved postminingland use shall be reclaimed in accordance with the approved reclamationplan as soon as practicable after it is no longer needed for mining andreclamation operations. This reclamation shall include:(1) Closing the road to traffic; (2) Removing all bridges and culverts unless approved as part of the postminingland use; (3) Removing or otherwise disposing of road-surfacing materials that areincompatible with the postmining land use and revegetation requirements;(4) Reshaping cut and fill slopes as necessary to be compatible with thepostmining land use and to complement the natural drainage pattern of thesurrounding terrain; (5) Protecting the natural drainage patterns by installing dikes or crossdrains as necessary to control surface runoff and erosion; and (6) Scarifying or ripping the roadbed; replacing topsoil or substitutematerial, and revegetating disturbed surfaces in accordance with andSection;andSection;816.22 and 816.111 through 816.116 of this chapter. 12. Section 816.151 is reinstated and revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 816.151</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary roads. </ITAG>Primary roads shall meet the requirements of section 816.150 and the additionalrequirements of this section. (a) <T3>Certification</T3>. The construction or reconstruction of primary roadsshall be certified in a report to the regulatory authority by a qualifiedregistered professional engineer, or in any State which authorizes landsurveyors to certify the construction or reconstruction of primary roads,a qualified registered professional land surveyor with experience in thedesign and construction of roads. The report shall indicate that the primaryroad has been constructed or reconstructed as designed and in accordancewith the approved plan. (b) <T3>Safety Factor</T3>. Each primary road embankment shall have a minimumstatic factor of 1.3 or meet the requirements established under andSection;780.37(c) of this chapter. (c) <T3>Location</T3>. (1) To minimize erosion, a primary road shall be located,insofar as is practicable, on the most stable available surface. (2) Fords or perennial or intermittent streams by primary roads are prohibitedunless they are specifically approved by the regulatory authority as temporaryroutes during periods of road construction. (d) <T3>Drainage control</T3>. In accordance with the approved plan_(1) Each primary road shall be constructed or reconstructed, and maintainedto have adequate drainage control, using structures such as, but not limitedto bridges, ditches, cross drains, and ditch relief drains. The drainagecontrol system shall be designed to safely pass the peak runoff from a10-year, 6-hour precipitation event, or greater event as specified by theregulatory authority; (2) Drainage pipes and culverts shall be installed as designed, and maintainedin a free and operating condition and to prevent or control erosion atinlets and outlets; (3) Drainage ditches shall be constructed and maintained to prevent uncontrolleddrainage over the road surface and embankment; (4) Culverts shall be installed and maintained to sustain the verticalsoil pressure, the passive resistance of the foundation, and the weightof vehicles using the road; (5) Natural stream channels shall not be altered or relocated without theprior approval of the regulatory authority in accordance with applicableandSection; 816.41 through 816.43 and 816.57 of this chapter; and (6) Except as provided in paragraph (c)(2) of this section, structuresfor perennial or intermittent stream channel crossings shall be made usingbridges, culverts, low-water crossings, or other structures designed, constructed,and maintained using current, prudent engineering practices. The regulatoryauthority shall ensure that low-water crossings are designed, constructed,and maintained to prevent erosion of the structure or streambed and additionalcontributions of suspended solids to steamflow. (2) <T3>Surfacing</T3>. Primary roads shall be surfaced with material approvedby the regulatory authority as being sufficiently durable for the anticipatedvolume of traffic and the weight and speed of vehicles using the road.<ITAG tagnum="56">PART 817_PERMANENT PROGRAM PERFORMANCE STANDARDS_UNDERGROUND MININGACTIVITIES</ITAG>13. The authority citation for Part 817 is revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="21"><T4>Authority: </T4>Pub. L. 95-87, 30 U.S.C. 1201 <T3>et seq</T3>., as amended; sec. 115 of Pub. L. 98-146, 30 U.S.C. 1257;and Pub. L. 100-34.</ITAG>14. Section 817.150 is reinstated and revised to read as follows: <ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 817.150</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Roads: general. </ITAG>(a) <T3>Road classification system</T3>. (1) Each road, as defined in andSection;701.5 of this chapter, shall be classified as either a primary road oran ancillary road. (2) A primary road is any road which is_ (i) Used for transporting coal or spoil; (ii) Frequently used for access or other purposes for a period in excessof six months; or (iii) To be retained for an approval postmining land use. (3) An ancillary road is any road not classified as a primary road (b) <T3>Performance standards</T3>. Each road shall be located, designed, constructed,reconstructed, used, maintained, and reclaimed so as to: (1) Control or prevent erosion, siltation, and the air pollution attendantto erosion, including road dust and dust occurring on other exposed surfaces,by measures such as vegetating, watering, using chemical or other dustsuppressants, or otherwise stabilizing all exposed surfaces in accordancewith current, prudent engineering practices;(2) Control or prevent damage to fish, wildlife, or otheir habitat andrelated environmental values;(3) Control or prevent additional contributions of suspended solids tostreamflow or runoff outside the permit area;(4) Neither cause nor contribute to, directly or indirectly, the violationof State or Federal water quality standard applicable to receiving waters;(5) Refrain from seriously altering the normal flow of water in streambedsor drainage channels;(6) Prevent or control damage to public or private property, includingthe prevention or mitigation of adverse effects on lands within the boundariesof units of the National Park System, the National Wildlife Refuge System,the National System of Trails, the National Wilderness Preservation System,the Wild and Scenic Rivers System, including designated study rivers, andNational Recreation Areas designated by Act of Congress; and(7) Use nonacid- and nontoxic-forming substances in road surfacing. (c) <T3>Design and construction limits and establishment of design criteria.</T3>To ensure environmental protection appropriate for their planned durationand use, including consideration of the type and size of equipment used,the design and construction or reconstruction of roads shall incorporateappropriate limits for grade, width, surface materials, surface drainagecontrol, culvert placement, and culvert size, in accordance with current,prudent engineering practices, and any necessary design criteria establishedby the regulatory authority. (d) <T3>Location. </T3>(1) No part of any road shall be located in the channelof an intermittent or perennial stream unless specifically approved bythe regulatory authority in accordance with applicable andSection;andSection;817.41 through 817.43 and 817.57 of this chapter. (2) Roads shall be located to minimize downstream sedimentation and flooding.(e) <T3>Maintenance.</T3> (1) A road shall be maintained to meet the performancestandards of this part and any additional criteria specified by the regulatoryauthority;(2) A road damaged by a catastrophic event, such as a flood or earthquake,shall be repaired as soon as is practicable after the damage has occurred.(f) <T3>Reclamation. </T3>A road not to be retained under an approved postminingland use shall be reclaimed in accordance with the approved reclamationplan as soon as practicable after it is no longer needed for mining andreclamation operations. This reclamation shall include:(1) Closing the road to traffic;(2) Removing all bridges and culverts unless approved as part of the postminingland use;(3) Removing or otherwise disposing of road-surfacing materials that areincompatible with the postmining land use and revegetation requirements;(4) Reshaping cut and fill slopes as necessary to be compatible with thepostmining land use and to complement the natural drainage pattern of thesurrounding terrain; (5) Protecting the natural drainage patterns by installing dikes or crossdrains as necessary to control surface runoff and erosion; and(6) Scarifying or ripping the roadbed, replacing topsoil or substitutematerial and revegetating disturbed surfaces in accordance with andSection;andSection;817.22 and 817.111 through 817.116 of this chapter. 15. Section 817.151 is reinstated and revised to read as follows:<ITAG tagnum="80">andSection; 817.151</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="89">Primary roads.</ITAG>Primary roads shall meet the requirements of andSection; 817.150 and theadditional requirements of this section.(a) <T3>Certification. </T3>The construction or reconstruction of primary roadsshall be certified in a report to the regulatory authority by a qualifiedregistered professional engineer, or in any State which authorizes landsurveyors to certify the construction or reconstruction of primary roads,a qualified registered professional land surveyor, with experience in thedesign and construction of roads. The report shall indicate that the primaryroad has been constructed or reconstructed as designed and in accordancewith the approved plan. (b) <T3>Safety Factor. </T3>Each primary road embankment shall have a minimumstatic factor of 1.3 or meet the requirements established under andSection;784.24(c).(c) <T3>Location. </T3>(1) To minimize erosion, a primary road shall be located,insofar as is practicable, on the most stable available surface. (2) Fords of perennial or intermittent streams by primary roads are prohibitedunless they are specifically approved by the regulatory authority as temporaryroutes during periods of road construction. (d) <T3>Drainage control. </T3>In accordance with the approved plan_(1) Each primary road shall be constructed or reconstructed, and maintainedto have adequate drainage control, using structures such as, but not limitedto bridges, ditches, cross drains, and ditch relief drains. The drainagecontrol system shall be designed to safely pass the peak runoff from a10-year, 6-hour precipitation event, or greater event as specified by theregulatory authority;(2) Drainage pipes and culverts shall be installed as designed, and maintainedin a free and operating condition and to prevent or control erosion atinlets and outlets;(3) Drainage ditches shall be constructed and maintained to prevent uncontrolleddrainage over the road surface and embankment;(4) Culverts shall be installed and maintained to sustain the verticalsoil pressure, the passive resistance of the foundation, and the weightof vehicles using the road;(5) Natural stream channels shall not be altered or relocated without theprior approval of the regulatory authority in accordance with applicableandSection;andSection; 816.41 through 816.43 and 816.57 of this chapter; and(6) Except as provided in paragraph (c)(2) of this section, structuresfor perennial or intermittent stream channel crossings shall be made usingbridges, culverts, low-water crossings, or other structures designed, constructed,and maintained using current, prudent engineering practices. The regulatoryauthority shall ensure that low-water crossings are designed, constructed,and maintained to prevent erosion of the structure or streambed and additionalcontributions of suspended solids to streamflow. (e) <T3>Surfacing. </T3>Primary roads shall be surfaced with material approvedby the regulatory authority as being sufficiently durable for the anticipatedvolume of traffic and the weight and speed of vehicles using the road.<ITAG tagnum="40">[FR Doc. 88-25688 Filed 11-7-88; 8:45 am]</ITAG><ITAG tagnum="68">BILLING CODE 4310-05-M </ITAG></ITAG></ITAG></TEXT></DOC>